Barney Palm - Drums, Percussion, Strange Sounds
I took this picture from the end of my driveway.
In a family-based society such as Peru’s my answer is perplexing. Their faces return a blank stare when I reply yes, I’m alone in this big bad world. A stern, disapproving blankness abounds, as if the math doesn’t compute. My age times perceived wealth plus average to above average handsomeness and lack of visible deformities should equal a wife. I should have two children by now, at least. It doesn’t make any sense, they ponder with suspicious scrunched-up eyebrows. Suppressing their laughter during the delivery, a few women have asked if I have husband—which is quite a daring joke given the thick Andean conservativeness common to the area. It always gets a chuckle. I say no husband either. They serve me another drink, whisper something in Quecha. This is where I settle into my rant about youth and responsibilities and the need to live adventures while you can but always cut the line before reeling them in. It’s obvious they’re not really listening. It doesn’t matter what I say. The math doesn’t compute.
“It is hard to understand why Speaker Boehner would walk away from this kind of deal and frankly, if you look at the commentary out there, there are a lot of Republicans that are puzzled as to why it couldn’t get done,” he said. “In fact, there are a lot of Republican voters out there who are puzzled as to why it couldn’t get done.”
I have found myself again prowling around the back catalogue of famous bands, listening to their albums that didn’t have the big hit. A couple of these tracks got some airplay, but this was the last decent BTO sandwich before it all went to hell.
His prompt reply was waiting in our inbox this morning:
Here is my Husband, trying to finish up quickly, poor thing I told him to smile for the camera but he had white dust everywhere from Sanding the Dray wall! Thanks for stopping by, When all is done I will sure share some pictures of how it finally looks. I love looking around blog land for the way crafters keep their craft stash organized, so I will share that too!
It feels good. But after a week of it, I know I don't like it. It has no style, a straight part and its just BLAH. Let's go shorter, okay!! Taking you back to last night, I have her cut it again, another 2-3 inches, layered and cuuuuuuuuuuuuute. Just like the way I had it four years ago. I love! :) I'm sure my hair story will continue. But this works for me now, I can just barely get away with putting it up, washing is quick, straightening is quick, and not doing anything with it is even quicker!
Everything is pulled from the walls. The television is still on, playing a version of Super Mario Brothers I've never seen. But it's pulsing, pullling me in.
That is why I am rejoicing with you, you will never go lower than where you are now.
Just to clarify, my natural parents are still together and they have had two children after me. I have a full blood sister and brother.
The brightest and most articulate people in the business can often manipulate research to say anything they want it to. If it’s on the agency’s agenda to change the direction of the advertsing, then that change will invariably happen and they’ll sweep the client along on a sea of excitement and anticipation. Sad but true.
I owe a huge apology to Vanessa Gebbie and Bloomsbury who had booked to visit me here yesterday. I stood her up. So by way of making amends, it would be great if you all bought a copy of the newly-published paperback edition of The Coward's Tale!
4. Fires Of Rome - Dawn Lament (4:12)
I created this little game to help my students practice their addition facts up to 20. Our district has mandated that all students in second grade be able to complete 50 additon facts up to 20 in 2 1/2 minutes!! My kids do great with single digits, but this test includes problems all the way up to 20 + 0.
One option is illustrated by the timing and content of yesterday's TUC press release (which does not even hint at the possibility of strike action).
Just got in this evening ... thought I'd slip in a quick hello to all of you!
On Friday the Sudanese army announced liberation of Heglig, which includes Sudan’s biggest oil fields, after bloody battles with South Sudan army.
2. Seasons don’t usually come in the exact order — Winter, Spring, Summer, Fall. Sometimes we get Winter three months straight. Or, like me, having died several times in the same body, rebirthed and paved a new way to amazement, spring into a new, better version of myself, all year round. Read: delusional. -Kelly Cutrone
In the Gospel of Mark, after ministering to the multitude for several days, Jesus spends a little quiet time high on a mountain with Peter, James and John. For a short while Jesus is joined by Moses and Elijah, prompting some intrepidation on the part of the disciples, when; And a cloud came and overshadowed them; and a voice came out of the cloud, saying, “This is My beloved Son. Hear Him!” (Mark 9:7). God used a cloud as a vehicle to get the attention of the believers, so they would focus, listen and hear the words of Christ.
Oh, and while we were in Home Depot picking up the pvc pipe... Brad decided we needed these:
But I also believe that at a certain point – by the age of 30 at the latest – every adult has to accept their past for whatever it was and take responsibility for their present and future. That means it’s up to them to undo or at least make peace with damages past, refuse to be a victim, and consciously work to live well and responsibly in the world around them.
We talked about the little boy, his mom. The dad told me they live in the Outer Mission. I told him I live in the Inner Mission.
How true are all these all these warnings, can one wish them away. How bad will it get before it is good again, how strong must we be to survive, can we survive. Is history against us?
In a large dutch oven heat butter and oil together. Add in your leeks first for about 2 minutes and then your cauliflower.
ELLA showed the beautiful and feminine V for Victory collection at the New York Fashion Week earlier this year and at the Reykjavik Fashion Festival in March (above photos). Elisa Pervinca Bellini covered RFF for Vogue Italia and wrote about ELLA: "On the catwalk there are outfits, suits and little black dresses that wrap the body without constricting it, with neutral colours such as grey, black, white but also orange and antique blue." She also quoted Elinros Lindal: "Our collection’s focus is on quality of fabrics, that are all made in Italy and created by Loro Piana ... while the silhouettes are inspired to a classy woman, that travels a lot.” Elinros and her team were inspired by the post-war years and '70s glamour when designing the AW collection and actress Lauren Hutton was their muse.
Some can look
We have a great book all about trees and what type they are and the boys love looking at that too.
Pay attention
The 1860 Census indicates that, in addition to the Ray children, two other youngsters were living with the Ray’s. John T. Ray, Thomas Ray’s 15 year old nephew, lived with the family and attended school along with his cousins. John T. Ray would be killed in a train wreck in 1888 (see Railroad Horror! 1888 Train wreck kills John T. Ray and 30-odd others.) A young girl nine-year-old Efare Hayes (aka Ellifare Hayes), who was also living in the Ray household did not attend school.9 Later census forms show that she was a domestic servant for the Rays. The census records show Ray’s neighbors were John Gaskins and Louie M. Young. The 1860 U.S. Federal Census – Slave Schedules show in that year Thomas M. Ray also was a slave owner, with one black female slave and one slave house enumerated.
When asked about the future, he is optimistic of continuing: “I’m going to keep eating my porridge every morning and ­coming into work to meet all these lovely people. Your feet go first when you get older, but I’ve still got my brain.”
You could also use it with lower level students to practise the alphabet or vocabulary you’ve studied recently.
My tai chi instructor would take one look at my movement and identify where I was holding stress. It usually manifested in my right shoulder. My movement was stiff and restricted. At work, I notice the tension in my right shoulder when I sit at my desk. I relax my shoulder and step away from my desk for a few minutes.
Second Mile??
CAPA works in Hillsdale County in an effort to eliminate child abuse and neglect through advocacy and education. The council has several programs this year that they are very proud of.
I've been busy organising a spate of mini repairs around the house - new taps for the bath, as the old original ones finally gave up the ghost, booking a painter to come and paint our bedroom, my time of shinning up ladders to paint 15' high ceilings is over I'm afraid, buying and fitting a new loo seat, so that you don't feel like you risk a giant clam bite every time you go for a pee!
No. There's another series on PS2 called .Hack G.U. So... went a hunting for it! I checked my ever so trusty Amazon and... it's fucking 30 bucks for the game USED!
It is completely organized.
Remember when MTV used to play videos? Ha...you're old dude.
The basic gist is that you are to diligently follow the workout and meal plans (or, in P90X parlance, “bring it”) for 3 months. After this time, they promise, you'll be ripped, shredded, and altogether awesome.
“My darling boy,” she said. “Lord Harrington used to be an old friend of mine. Oh, don’t be surprised. Indeed, we have been lovers when I was very young. From this unlucky union two children were born, two twin boys. He wanted to know nothing of us and later he thought of us as a danger to his good name and fortune. Twenty-three years ago, when you were only eight month old…
I also took Vicky's tag (round circle with a fancy edge) and filled up the page with these (I had extras).
Bludgeon the fool.
What other movies are there out there wherein the main female character’s storyline does not include tension over who she gets to make out with?
Today, Danielle asks me to consider, “What can you do to make your relationship to time feel freer so it’s supporting you to have space to make your medicine, to have your genius come forth, and for you to be free in the world and what you do?”
And just so you don't think I'm only spewing the obvious stuff here's the odd ball pick of the day
My morning coat, my collar mounting firmly to the chin,
Highlight these names, mention them in your blog posts. These people have the power to change things and they should know it. Their Google Alerts on their names will be crammed with our anger.
mission! Enjoy my breakfast, full stop. Enjoy my bus ride. Enjoy my coffee. Enjoy work. Enjoy lunch. Enjoy work. Enjoy my bus ride. Enjoy dinner. Enjoy repose. Enjoy reading. Enjoy sleep. Enjoy the morning routine. Enjoy breakfast & repeat.
4-3-08 Article 'Obama was 'quite religious in Islam''
Consummates desire into emotional equilibrium
5. Trader Joe’s Quinoa frozen veggie mix was awesome last night and now I have leftovers for lunch. No fuss, great flavor.
If you answer yes to any of the above then find another medium. A medium who is natural born and good at their work will not allow you to tell them things until after the reading. They will never charge for absent healing – and usually not for any other type either. Their charges for a reading should be reasonable and not too high. If they exceed £50 (UK) that is high enough and in my eyes already too much. The average price for a GOOD reading from a true medium is usually no more than £30 – £40 maximum. I have heard people saying that if a medium or psychic charges a lot, it must mean they’re good. It means no such thing, it just means they are greedy and ego is their God.
It started off with the ad on TV for SafeFood. If you’re Irish you’ll know the one who rubs the chicken breasts all over before placing them in the oven. However, unlike any other normal person who just feels uncomfortable going about with slimy and sticky hands, she actually then proceeds to rub the slime first into her hair, then onto her daughter’s dinner before finally transferring an all out Salmonella-assault onto her daughter’s face. Now, maybe I’m just unusual in my approach to both food safety and general hygiene, but I’d be inclined to think she’s definitely not reading off the same sheet as me. Hell, I think she went to a different library, in a different era for a copy of the sheet. That ad angers me. When it comes on I shout at the TV, aggressively. I take the point that they get the message across. Does it really have to be so gross? What kind of woman wants to go about with gunk in her hair- excepting Mary of course.
Our only car is out of commission; we don't know if the insurance will fix it, write it off as a total loss, or tell us to get stuffed. The only thing we do know is that Eöl has to have a way to get to work, and I really don't want to run my mom's car to pieces.
This is the last day at Bintan for Scott and Rafaella, so they took the opportunity. We are going to really miss our friends they have been so much fun, it has made our holiday so much better.
A million worthless things
It was important to have Hamish looking right but I wasn’t sure how I wanted him to look. In this instance I was lucky enough to be able to work closely with my illustrator
I wanted to tell a story with an environmental message. I wanted to say something about the damage we’re doing to the species we share this planet with in the pursuit of fuel and resources, even if it’s cloaked in an analogy with flying tigers and chainsaw katana fights. :P
Thanks so much, Linda, for hosting me on your lovely blog, today. Coming here is like landing in a peaceful space. I so enjoy visiting and have hopes now of leaving something behind as tangible thanks for the enjoyment I’ve had.
Not much history of these ancient times and people were preserved in our ‘Western’ history books, but yet there are a few bits and pieces to be found that provides a general impression of what some of these ancient people were like, and it does not paint a pretty picture. The narrative I have complied below is nowhere near a complete account of the vicious breed of races that existed in ancient times, and neither does it imply that ALL Asians were infected by the evil seed of Cain, or the perverted religion established by him.
I plan on belting the dress and wearing this dress today for Cinco De Mayo! The color is perfect bright and fun!
arlight. thats it for today.
Jim: "How so Bob? It is the Winter League after all, and we're well on into Spring! I should know, we're having far too many Very Sunny days for my complexion."
Summer Chicken Salad:
The vinegar rinse I'm not as in love with, Yes it leaves the hair shiny but I notice the vinegar smell after it's dried. I do add a couple drops of essential oil (Rainforest blend) to make it smell better but I still find I need a bit of styling product to scrunch my curls. On days I don't scrunch, but just blowdry - it's amazing. I just don't like the vinegar smell.
Granted, I know those questions are leftovers from my dream, but why now? I took my question to the most logical place: My therapist. We got to talking about transition, and then I sort of had that light bulb moment.
This week, I was bestowed the wonderful honor of being named RPG Site of The Year through a contest hosted by Stuffer Shack. It is truly a wonderful surprise, and I want to thank everyone that voted for me last week to make it into the Finals. I also wanted to thank Tourq Stevens from Stuffer Shack for organizing and hosting the contest. His efforts led to the acknowledgement of many great blogs and podcasts. Even though the contest is a competition, the event fosters a great sense of community and brought me into contact with other websites that I did not know about previously. The fact that the judges voted for me as the RPG Site of The Year is truly an honor, and I thank them for that recognition.
LCED00046 Ironworks Accents
I see now that her heart may have been the right place, but at the time I was not the least bit happy. I was trying to keep my drug addiction and my rehab stay under wraps and away from the general public…and here she was telling everyone in my phone. Her calling, texting, and fb messaging threats to an unknown…yet probably very large…amount of people really threw a wrench into my plans of secrecy. pffff.
I was 12 years old and in love with Boy Scouts. I was at Camp Horse Shoe, which is located in Rising Sun, Maryland. I was with three other boys and we were taking a shortcut back to our camp so we wouldn’t miss lunch. The lead boy, who knew the shortcut, led us up this boulder-covered ravine. We were making our way up this ravine when the boy who was in front yelled, “Wow, what’s that?”
So much blood.
Byte What mosquitoes do
It's been and gone. Gone and been.
Even though I was too sick to squeeze in any last minute excursions the last two weeks before my kids returned to school, I did manage to do a lot of fun activities earlier in our summer vacation. This year, I bought a pass to our local pool and the kids and Iwent several times a week throughout the summer.
I wanted to talk to you guys a little bit about CSN.com!
I am so happy to have one more problem solved.
*Family devotion at supper at least 3-4 nights a week. We were doing really well with this but have fallen by the wayside.
But she soon got another job as a “reservist” in the Department of Defence in Pretoria in 2010. This is in full contradiction of the law that states that no person appointed in a military reservist position should have a criminal record.
Seaworld San Diego
Most of the gadgets and devices you use today have these elements in them. However, the by product or waste of these useful metal are mild radiactive slurries......and also very toxic acid is used in the refining process.
I'm also still working on my certification to be an aerobics instructor. 3 more weeks of class, a weekend of tests and certifications, and then 4 weeks of team teaching. Seems like a lot, but there's a lot more involved than I realized when I decided to do it. I have a much deeper respect for all those instructors now!!
Mary didn't try to replot my novel or redesign my characters, but she did point out when I was heading for trouble:
The Guidette Knitters--Hoodie's knitting crew, who frequent the arcades, jamming needles into the pinball machine coin slots to get beer money, throw yarn balls at the seagulls, and sit on the boardwalk benches with their knitting bags and Buds.
~ 4 pieces of 8 1/2"x11" card stock
I am a traditional girl in some ways, but I also love to mix things up!
She told me about the winter of 1929. ‘I was just a little girl, a tiny little thing. We lived near the Fondamenta Nuova. You never saw anything like it. The ice was so thick on the little canals that the gondolas popped up on top like grape pips!’
So far, I don't think that's happened here in Oregon. Or rather, after it started to happen in the 80s and 90s, breweries retooled and brought street cred back to good beer. I think they partly did that through strength and aggressiveness--it's hard to describe an 80 IBU, 8% double IPA as "poncey." It also helps that we have so many breweries, too--most Portlanders have seen brewers toiling away and see it for what it is, hard, rugged work. And it further helps that the many of the good pubs around town are downscale. There just aren't that many pretentious places to sully the good beverage.
But in my dreams you still are mine,
‘Each of da trees is dirty now. So, it’s dirty tree, and dirty tree, and dirty tree. Dat is 99.’
The new issue of Enchanting Creations is out, and
Spent Fuel at Southern California’s San Onofre Nuclear Plant and the Threat of Radiation
I mean some I understand
Paranormal isn't usually my thing, but I loved White Cat and Red Glove by Holly Black which is a clever twist on the usual tropes. Our hero Cassel comes with plenty of problems, part of a family of magic workers in a world where magic is illegal, he's living with the knowledge that he killed his best friend.
Today's word is:
But that is where the particular problem is, since the conduct of the State and its organs is often found to be lacking in the basic ingredients of fairplay, accountability and transparency.
"That's fine, so long as the benefit claimed is true," you say. I agree. Fallacious and deceitful advertising is wrong. Deliberate misrepresentation of a product can't really be ascribed any intention other than duping people. But this brings us to a related problem, which was best summarized by Bill Bernbach:
Hannah
Appellants' admission that, "there are probably enough tools and routines disclosed in the cited over 600 page Project text through the use of which the system of the invention could be built," is itself an apparent concession that the claimed invention would have been obvious in view of the Microsoft Project 98 software product described in the Project reference.
i'm happy to report it's still reddish orange.
Now that Drake’s Take Care has been out for a couple weeks and we’ve all had some time to consider our emoooootions. It’s time to get back to real fix-the-economy business and rank the field of Drake Memes because, I don't know, because I just spent six million dollars on myself and I feel amazing?
They found the Los Altos feeding clinic at a price tag of $20,000.
will put ‘em back together,
One month from today...
The PCW Competition Committee has made their decision and it will be a three way dance Monday night for the #1 contender’s spot and a shot at the PCW Tag Team title at Lock and Load next week. So Monday night’s main event will be:
It was OK for me, I was anaesthetised, but all my family and friends were frightened, angry and hurt and were running around trying to find a way to stop this nightmare. Lots of rehabs, police turning up, paramedics, discharging myself from hospital, suicide attempts, psychiatrists, psychologists, counsellors, medication, unemployed, described by my GP as a chronic alcoholic and there is nothing more he could do.
So I find myself wondering what role Twitter and Web 2.0 might have played in the life and works of these two extraordinary men. Would the homes they lived and worked in still have provided them with the space they needed to develop themselves and their projects? Darwin in particular spent years working on his theories. He knew that they would shake the establishment to its core and provoke controversy throughout the Western world, and therefore he refined and re-defined them scrupulously for years. Ultimately he was forced into publication by receipt of an unsolicited paper from Alfred Russel Wallace, another young naturalist who had independently reached similar conclusions. One can’t help wondering how much longer he would have worked before publication without this external impetus – or whether in a world of 24/7 external information exchange he would have developed the powers of observation that gave rise to his discoveries in the first place? Would Churchill have had an army of research assistants Tweeting constant updates on the life of the Duke of Marlborough manuscript in progress and if so would the Tweets have obviated the need for anyone to buy the book when complete?
Tangi's Teardrops is a clean book and I highly recommend it to anyone young or old."
For reasons best known to themselves, some of LMU's lecturers have taken against Chillisauce.
Well....the San Francisco Decorator Showcase is over for this year, and it was quite a success. There was plenty of inspiration to keep me thinking until next year. There were luxurious sofas and creative wall treatments......beautiful beds and monumental art pieces....quirky accessories and sparkling mirrors....
Some suggestions to help you get started
448110 Men’s clothing stores
Filter the mixture through a very fine sieve or cheesecloth and pour into a clear jug or glass/clear plastic bowl.
dealing with the Jews. The Gentiles were called “dogs” (Matthew 15:22-27.) The Jews then looked for the Messiah, a Saviour, the very Deliverer God had promised back in early Genesis.
I don't want to lose any fitness during this, but I want to heal. I need your opinion
This time? If the past is any predictor of the future, the deliberately nonhierarchical Occupy Wall Street movement, with its fuzzy messages and vague goals, is not going to leave a major mark.
A red flashlight is also handy. This allows you to chart or book that you have to ruin your night vision to observe. If you can not buy a red torch, just cover a normal white light torch with red cellophane.
Wednesday, November 16 - 1 pm MST, 3 pm Eastern
I'll be live-blogging here. Keep reloading for more updates.
Today life seems a bit unsure, not for us directly but for our eldest child (my step-daughter). She is engaged to marry the only guy she has ever loved, since she was 13 years old. They have a 10 year old son together, but they have not been together for all that time.
Overwhelming lostness. These are the only words that come to my mind when I consider what we witnessed at the Ganges River. According to Hinduism, the Ganges is the most sacred of all rivers. The “holiest” cities of Hinduism rest along its banks. Every year, scores of Hindus travel to the Ganges to wash themselves in its water. By simply washing in the Ganges, they believe that they can be cleansed of all evil and receive passage into heaven. Last year, in one month alone, during the festival of Kumbha Mela, over 50 million Hindus traveled near to the place where I am standing in this video below to bathe in the Ganges. Ironically, this river is considered by others to be one of the dirtiest rivers of the world. A recent article in The Economist called the Ganges River a “brown soup of excrement and industrial effluents.”
* There may or may not have been multiple takes, and this may or may not have been the best one.
The first, ‘The Earthquake in Chile,’ (reminiscent of the earlier Lisbon earthquake which, ironically, led to a lot of Voltaire‘s pessimistic leanings), is an initially sweet, simple tale of two lovers, separated by imprisonment and under the death penalty for continuing an affair in a convent. They are freed from captivity and fortuitously united thanks to the chaos wrought by Nature, but in a tense finale, after what seemed an idyllic new pastoral world being formed, the pair are unmasked by worshipers on Church grounds and clubbed to death for their sins, (along with their protector’s sister-in-law in a case of mistaken identity, and his infant son, mistaken for their bastard offspring, “…whirled…in the air…and dashed…against a pillar of the church).
Jakob Andreasen, Chief Engineer
Well there are a number of contributing factors as to why I’m keeping a blog. I love sharing things that I love with people and love learning about what other people love. I truly believe that taking a piece of someone’s unique life that you particularly find interesting and being able to incorporate it in some twisted way into your own life is what makes for super awesome people. That’s just my philosophy. Another reason is a dear friend of mine, and fellow blogger Taylor suggested I do so. I love her. We will be roomies again pretty soon (Lord willing). Hopefully in a few short months I’ll be picking up and moving to Nashville, Tennessee. Granted I find a job. But that is a whole other pile of glitter to jump into.
Oh Goddess
Black and opaque with a tan head. They say this one is over 7% alcohol. Medium to high chocolate and malt. Full Mouthfeel. Nicely done. There is no smoke yet a light-medium hops in this porter on the back of the pallet. I'm starting to feel it now, and I need to change clothes before the reunion party. 3 Stars.
But that wasnt the end of my troubles and there is a MAJOR GLITCH in Youtubes system at the mo which prevents thousands of people not being able to upload over 15 minute long videos amongst other issues but I wont bore you any more with my problems with getting these videos done. Put it this way though......with the mood Ive been in over these videos and if I had have gotten my hands on a YT helpy person thingy.....I may have made them pee their Y-fronts! Heehee..........can you even imagine me being peeved with someone, lol. Sounds funny I know, heehee....but it does happens......sometimes, lol.
The tentacle wrapped itself around Haley’s stomach and it lifted her high into the air. The hooded figures fell to the knees and began to chant “Y’ha-nthlei! Y’ha-nthlei! Y’ha-nthlei!” Michal could only gaze at them, transfixed with embarrassment. The air was heavy with incense. Somebody was pounding on a tambourine. Haley was squealing with delight as the tentacle waved her around in the air, brandishing her little body in triumph.
200g plain flour
Alternate Catastrophe Awning Finish all classes with gold trophies on all cups (including mirror mode)
The high school textbooks were funded by the U.S. military’s foreign aid arm, the Commander’s Emergency Response Program.
Holy eff balls.
Part three
People will say that I need to search for the Lord and try and find his perfect plan for my life. I need to submit to his ultimate authority.
That frae November till October,
1 sodei
I said above that this happened in real life. It's true.
“Domingo Valderas.”
100. “Until you make peace with who you are, you’ll never be content with what you have.” – Doris Mortman
There will still be one more After in this foyer's transformation, when we replace the glass with a solid frosted panel. Not sure when we'll go ahead and pull the trigger on that, but it's in the works.
So, he writes back within the hour. “You’re from Fairmont? Do I know you?” blah blah blah….
These octogenarian sisters will still occasionally say something like, “N, remember when you ate my bread pudding?” Ah, memories.
I would prefer not to have one in the back seat of my car.
We must conclude that any British paramilitary organization worthy of the name will certainly be able to acquire substantial quantities of ammonium nitrate, through setting up some agricultural operation itself as a front if necessary. It will be completely impossible for even the most careful efforts of the security services to reliably derail attempts by these paramilitaries to obtain ammonium nitrate in significant quantities. Accordingly, as was true of the IRA, there will be no obvious limit to the number or size of the bombs they will be able to build assuming they have the required expertise in certain key regards.
What would you do???
San Francisco Chronicle (press release)
How many voices are impaled on the
When I was growing up I learned so much of my humor and life lessons from looking at you. So please make yourself known to the world by appearing on television/the internet more often. I would be happy to list those shows but frankly there are too many. If you were drawn and were on television in the 90′s you should still be shown somewhere. I want to watch you and remember the good old days when I would get home from school and eat some Gushers and drink a Hi-C juice box.
I have been horrible at taking his weekly monkey photos. I know I've missed the last two weeks. I sure hope I remember this week, poor guy.
Cranberry Orange Almond Spice Bread
We saw all the “must-sees” – Brandenburg Gate, Checkpoint Charlie, Berlin Wall – and even got a glimpse of some “probably shouldn’t see” when we rode past the nude bathing area in the Tiergarten.
It's Teacher Appreciation Week! (Never mind that I thought it was last week and was killing myself to get projects done in time...) My two boys are blessed with really wonderful teachers this year, so I was very happy to show them a little love. When I was getting ready to make these cards, I intended to completely rip off this lovely Mother's Day card made by my fabulous friend Amy. But as I pulled the design from A Child's Year up on my Gypsy, I noticed this cute apple cut-out card and my wheels went spinning in an entirely different direction!
Recently we have been working on learning to infer when authors do not tell us everything that is going on with the characters in a story. This can be a difficult skill to master, especially for some of my struggling readers. I found these two great activities from Abby at The Inspired Apple. She made the super cute What's In My Teacher's Bag and What's In My Teacher's Trash.
Missy wrote a post today about coming home from hospital & feeling drawn to her Oracle Cards. She kindly offered to select one for me. I’m amazed at how accurate it is.
My answer is ABSOLUTELY!
Do you want to make some extra votes? Do
Strange Boutique (1980)
Eskenazi B, Pearson K. Validation of a self-administered questionnaire for assessing occupational and environmental exposures of pregnant women. Am J Epidemiol 1988; 128: 1117-1129.
Even if you meet all of the criteria noted above, you might still be excluded from status. Please take note of the very important qualification that INAC has recently posted on their website:
All sarcasm aside—some of these products might actually deliver on some of the promises that they make, but honestly, the commercials make it sound like if only you buy their product, your life will go from being “ho-hum” to absolutely dynamic. I can see why people whip out the credit card and make the 1-800 call. I was sorely tempted to be one of them, but thank goodness the cold meds hadn’t fuddled my brain enough to make me forget what my mother always used to say…”if it sounds too good to be true, it usually is!” So no, the UPS man isn’t making a daily drop of packages containing the latest in skin rejuvenation or weight loss despite all the high pressure sales pitches I watched.
Well, my definition of negative can be arguments, complaints, nags or pressing issues, or simply put, something stifling.
We departed early Saturday morning, to begin our six hour trek to Tofino.
1-30 images - £5 per image inserted
Now, as before, I will likely be spending my time playing catch-up around the house, but since the cleaning fairy actually DID arrive this month (in the form of my mother from across the country), I will have a bit of a reprise on the heavy duty items, so I am crossing my fingers that I can post much more frequently now and get back to a normal blog-life!
Thy home is high in heaven,
I have only a foot left...
-Boil the milk in a non stick pan wide enough to accomodate the patties,keep on medium heat and keep stirring to avoid burning of milk at the bottom.Wait till it reduces to 4 cups and thickens.
All submissions must be original manuscripts not previously published elsewhere or submitted elsewhere simultaneously with submission to this journal. All submissions will be sent to two members of the journal's peer review panel for their opinions concerning content, clarity, and relevance to cryptozoology. Their comments will then be studied by the editor whose decision is final concerning whether or not the manuscript is published, subject if necessary to amendments by the author(s) if suggested by the reviewers. The copyright of all published papers belongs to this journal.
Yes, it is. Not because the process is hard or complicated. The ‘how to’ is very simple.
A: Grace Kelly
the rain San Francisco had while I was in NYC.
10. We can actually be in our fourth week of school, and arrive to school ON TIME every day (except for the day we dropped off the kitty). This is HUGE after last year.
Defense attorney Steve Wax had urged that Seda remain out on bail, noting that his client had voluntarily returned face his charges in 2007.
Hugh McDonald is an “unofficial” member of the band.
What are common interests? Hobbies, sports, music, church, family, politics, even types of dating would be a common interest. When I went to dances, I try to ask odd questions to throw off the guy that I was talking with. In doing so, they found that they begin to talk with me for much longer than the end of the song.
In light of the efficiencies of package patent licensing and the important differences between product-to-patent tying arrangements and arrangements involving group licensing of patents, we reject the Commission’s conclusion that Philips’s conduct shows a "lack of any redeeming virtue" and should be "conclusively presumed to be unreasonable and therefore illegal without elaborate inquiry as to the precise harm they have caused or the business excuse for their use." N. Pac. Ry. Co. v. United States, 356 U.S. 1, 5 (1958). We therefore hold that the analysis that led the Commission to apply the rule of per se illegality to Philips’s package licensing agreements was legally flawed.
The online courses offered are very beneficial for adult learners as they have 24/7 access to the program – allowing students to customize their schedule and learn from home - and many of the courses are free of charge!
Just check out the title of my book!
"TOTALLY ready to go back down."
don't forget your sunscreen!
The opinion pages of the New York Times has this article entitled The Disposable Woman about the media, and societies, reaction to Charlie Sheen and his long history of abuse and violence against women.
Even as a high court battle to stop the Gauteng e-tolling system played out in Pretoria, the government was sticking to its guns, saying the implementation of the tolling project had reached the point of no return.
Innocent of committing a murder
"People go in, and a few minutes later I’ll hear bursts of laughter. To be honest, I think “she” likes it in there." - Thom Filicia on using his Emmy as a toilet paper holder.
When there is only one person witnessing the incident, they are far more likely to help someone in need.
It's Mike's first day on the job as a bartender.
Conservatives also do something called doubling down a lot. They will take a position. You then show them information that is contrary to their position. Instead of questioning the condition, they double down and believe in their position twice as hard as before.
Our lives–all lives–have value! Our lives–all lives–have worth! We stand with you in that declaration.
(80) If these responses often look rather oblique to the occasion that prompted them, it is because what matters is the saying and not the event.
You whisper nervously, "Go slowly," and I assure you that I will, and that I don't want to hurt you.
Hana
I'm wondering if this crush of hers might have anything to do with her not caring if I cark it, quite frankly. The first time she specifically asked about him, she was quite surprised to hear that he was my second husband, and that the Nestling Sparrow was a planned baby. The expression on her face said "How did someone like you manage to catch someone like him?!" Really, it was most unflattering to yours truly.
My sister and I both attended the Montessori school through the sixth grade. Mom continued working there until I had graduated from high school. The day following my graduation, my parents moved to the next county south and closed the furniture store. When Mom left the school, she started working for various accountants in town, eventually landing a position as resident bookkeeper for one particular business.
So, rather than the tedious undertaking with human censors to cut out politically incorrect opinions or jail their authors, it’s much simpler just to erase their domain names from the “telephone registry” — DNS. As the Germans say: Keine Hexerei, nur Behändigskraft.
Dark cherry color. Big cherry smell. Tart cherry taste. There is more though, mostly funky aromas and flavors. Mostly the same since it was bottled, just a bit less sweet than I remember. I wonder if the wine yeast I used at bottling killed off the Sacc. and Brett?
Just over one month ago, on St. Patrick’s Day, 17 March, Fakhra Younus climbed to the sixth-floor balcony of her apartment building in Rome. She then flung herself to her death onto the stones below.
The Gleick episode exposes again a movement that disdains arguing with its critics, choosing demonization over persuasion and debate. A confident movement would face and crush its critics if its case were unassailable, as it claims. The climate change fight doesn’t even rise to the level of David and Goliath. Heartland is more like a David fighting a hundred Goliaths. Yet the serial ineptitude of the climate campaign shows that a tiny David doesn’t need to throw a rock against a Goliath who swings his mighty club and only hits himself square in the forehead.
We had a huge tour comprised entirely of juniors, mostly from the east coast. Seniors visiting that day were called into a special meeting with an admissions dean and given a seperate tour. We saw many places on the tour including an amazing theater, a student art show, the famous anthenaem (the library, workout spaces, radio station, study areas and lord knows what else!) the dining hall, a four bedroom apartment, the lecture hall, dance studios, a typical classroom and the athletic center. The campus was easily walkable, but a common mode of transport seems to be skateboards.
The layout includes a number of homescreens stacked one on top of the other, with all the different options represented by circular icons. Each icon denotes an app, which can be either a game, the settings menu or a Twitter client, for example.
There is a claim, (blatant spin really) that Gordon Brown was somehow involved in a "difficult conversation" but watch the video back and there is nothing troubling about it at all. This is a bread and butter conversation in the street with a Labour supporter, who was identified by Gordon's own advisors in the crowd who had briefly vetted Mrs Duffy to ensure that she was somebody who would raise a concern, yet not really cause any real problems. The Prime Minister's own reporting lobby have been critical that he is not engaging anyone without a red rosette on the campaign trail, to which Gordon's staff replied by ensuring the rosettes were left at home, so the journo's could not complain. None-the-less, this women was vetted and deemed a useful pawn for the cameras.
If you are just starting out with couponing, the first thing is to start collecting coupons from the Sunday newspaper. Inside the Sunday newspaper you will find coupon inserts on mostly every Sunday, except for some Holiday weekends.
Another example of Tonino Guerra's versatility was the fact that he began writing films that fell firmly in the Italian neo-realist camp, he would go onto write one of Federico Fellini's more stylised and symbolic films, Il Casanova di Federico Fellini. He also wrote in a number of genres, from sword and sandal films (Perseo l'invincibile, released in 1963) to crime (L'assassino) to science fiction (La decima vittima) to comedy (Anonima cocottes, released in 1960). Given the sheer variety of genres in which he worked and how prolific he actually was (IMDB lists 104 films on which he worked in some capacity as a writer), it is even more amazing when one realises that not only did Tonino Guerra produce a number of classics, but most of the movies he wrote were quite good. A bad film written by Tonino Guerra was indeed a rare thing. Versatile, intelligent, and possessed a poet's view on life, Tonino Guerra was a great screenwriter in any language.
with her and participate in a blog discussion about the book. I jumped at the chance, not only because I wanted to get even more in-depth on this historical era, but also because Kari is really pretty awesome.
“All closed up,” the nurse announced, smiling.
1/2 cup grated Asiago cheese
Laminated Maps
I can now only hope that community-based art starts soon to receive as much attention and support as it deserves, but not just from the regular state or regional platforms, but from the artists themselves. Perhaps that’s the key to finally understand what the purpose of art is.
Welcome to my new blog. My sister inspired me to participate in project where I have 1001 days to do 101 things. As part of my 101 things I wanted to start a blog and so this is the start of something fun in my life. I hope I can post fun, interesting and exciting things on here that will keep you coming back. Please leave a comment if you so feel like it........
Hope you've been following the Leveson Inquiry...it's entertaining stuff even if you're not much interested in newspapers or politicians. Essentially you seem to have one bunch of grubby little men (and women) having a pop at another bunch of grubby little men (and women). And none of them come out of it with any credit. Would you give any of them house room? I know I wouldn't. This week we have The Murdochs (junior and senior) realising that their goose is cooked so far as having any real influence any more...and therefore adopting a scorched earth policy...taking down everyone they can. Nice. It would be good to think that at some stage we will have reason to admire the political and economic elite rather than just gaze on at their unrelenting awfulness. Wouldn't it?
I must say that I now have a great appreciation for those who work with food advertisement. It was extremely difficult to edit a plate of food while trying to make it look appetizing and maintaining it's appeal. I can't say, this month, that I have any one particular favorite. Each one seems to hit me in a different way, but lends to the authenticity of the original photo.
I imagine coming to work with a razor-sharp machete, rampaging up and down the aisles as I separate little heads from shoulders in an incredible ballet of homicide. The daydream is so visceral and complete that I can feel the warm spray of childrens’ plasma as it coats Barbie dolls, stipples Monopoly board games and soaks bargain action figures of popular super heroes.
Normally, long threadlike structures called neurites extend from neuronal cell bodies and connect neuron to neuron in an organized pattern.
What can you do? Buy locally from your farmers market. Avoid buying genetically-modified foods if you can (unfortunately, foods like corn flakes, bread and soy products are not required to tell you if their products contain genetically modified ingredients). Why does it matter? Because there has been virtually no testing to see what happens in our bodies once the genetically-modified organism is ingested. The old adage of, "you are what you eat" comes to mind. Do you really want herbicide-ready genes bouncing around in your body, doing who knows what? I know I don't want that.
Outside the slatted patio door
In the Canadian Rockies, wild bighorn sheep are said to take great risks to get at a rare psychoactive lichen. In scraping it off the rock surface they can wear their teeth down to the gums. http://www.pjonline.com/christmas/pj2010_723
Plans initially call for the establishment of a completion center in Chengdu for the Citation Sovereign. This would expand into production of parts and assembly of the Sovereign, and longer term, the Citation Latitude.
Well done Judith, there will be a package on its way to you on Monday!
26% in breast cancer
The biblical passage clearly states that man and woman are supposed to be gods and goddesses because we are the only beings were created in the image of God. For a lot of people this statement is very controversial but the biblical text is clear and other examples can be found throughout the Bible. Such as in Psalms 82:6-7, which states:
The slope of a supple hip
Going a bit farther back, no less a figure than Bill Monroe himself trod the Inn’s humble stage. You could make a movie about this place’s many brushes with fame, and it appears that one Patrick Isbey has done just that. Click here to see a clip from his documentary, The Station Inn: True Life Bluegrass.
Now a few quotes from some famous Irishmen:
It’s not just the TTC that I’m talking about though. The city of Toronto is, as a fact, the most diverse city in the world. I happen to live in Little Serbia. I can walk down the street and hear Serbian being spoken, there’s a bar called YuRock (Yugoslavia) near me but there are also shops owned by Lebanese people, Afghani people, Chinese people, Greek people, Serbs and even plain old European white people all within 3-minute walking distance of my apartment. I walk down the street a little and the street signs are now printed in the Greek alphabet, a little further down, there is no English at all, just Chinese and South Asian, a bit further and I’m in Little India. This is all within 30 minutes walking distance from my apartment, in a small section of the city. I work right beside the financial district, I see power-brokers with $10,000 suits walking by homeless people sleeping on subway vents. There are three universities and four colleges here, University of Toronto is always ranked No. 1 in Canada and in the top 10 in the world. We have one of the biggest pride parades in the world and one of the most inclusive societies too — our terrible mayor notwithstanding. You can walk five minutes from the core and be in a green park. Everything important in Canada is based in Toronto.
Tools: Oval Cutter, Modern label punch, window punch, CE, Big Shot, Delightful Trim Bigz die
this exciting new venue.
1/4 cup maple syrup
And that's just the way I like it!
Eyes of the Nun 2 (video) – Production Company
Mini Card Kit, but trust me...there is NOTHING Mini about it!!
What surprised me mostly during my search was the infinite number of people that seem to be experiencing the same sightings. Hundreds of people out there write about seeing particular sequences as well as seeing random sequences, at different periods in their lives. Even books has been published on this subject and when I mentioned my experiences to my mom this past summer, she read me a passage from one, stating in no uncertain terms that seeing sequences of numbers are the means by which our guardian angles tell us that we are on the right path.
Designer Wedding Dresses – Make Your Big Day Even More Special
So, yes, color is personal.
Water softening also reduces the cost of your weekly shop as you need less detergent, less dishwasher tablets and less toiletries to get the desired effect.
Such a sweet family.
There are some very impressive ministry college names in the list in his book. The one that caught my eye was, ‘New Covenant International Theological Seminary‘, which is supposedly located in Honolulu, Hawaii. Thank you Steve Levicoff!
'Happy' is from Authentique
I would suspect this discovery was made during the development of the linked suspension system. Where fluid lines are used to link the suspension in a similar manner to the Mercedes system I detailed earlier this year (http://scarbsf1.wordpress.com/2011/10/17/mercedes-innovative-linked-rear-suspension/). Perhaps the longer fluid lines to link front and rear suspension provided the discovery, rather than the very short left to right linking pipework. I understand Renault have had hydraulically linked suspension on the car since at least 2009.
In ancient societies, surrounding the early Jews, it was believed that by granting sexual favours to the high priest (a fertility rite), one would be guaranteed an abundance of children and crops.
o while I sit here looking at my son grow up, I am constantly asking myself can he grow up in a peaceful society when we don’t do any thing at a personal level and in my view we tend to hope that other people like are politicians will sort everything out and will keep us safe. I live in Ireland and over the last 20 years we have become a multi cultural nation, with many different languages and religions. Religion probably 1 of the most cont-reversal subjects to talk about it has been used now for thousands of years to justify wars ect. Personally I think each and every human that lives on this beautiful planet of ours and the only word that comes to mind is RESPECT RESPECT RESPECT and stop living in the past and just try to live in the moment..It takes time to train your mind like this but it is worth every effort that I have made, just think of living your life in slow motion like seeing a bee buzzing around a flower for pollen and getting to see this happen or smelling the morning air like really getting to use all your senses its a beautifull feeling. What has all this to do with living in peace???? Well when we experience true mindfulness and are at one with all why would we want to do harm to others and yes obviously others need to think the same thats were that word RESPECT COMES IN..We need to teach are children the same as it is them and there children who will shape the future all we can do is try to guide them in the right direction.. I came across this coll-um on the inter-net and taught people need to see this for there own eyes I hope it may change some peoples mind it did for me till my next post Respect each others feelings and treat others as you expect to be treated. PEACE JOE MC LEAN..
Today, I signed an historic agreement between the United States and Afghanistan that defines a new kind of relationship between our countries – a future in which Afghans are responsible for the security of their nation, and we build an equal partnership between two sovereign states; a future in which the war ends, and a new chapter begins.
We talk about a house with no neighbors.
Green Chile Posole with Black Beans
"Er ... I'm breastfeeding?"
This squirrel has already changed fur for the winter, the reddish brown is only left in the legs. He was sitting in our oak tree, apparently resting, and I thought he was just like me with my second cup of tea and newspaper, when I sit at the breakfast table alone after the men have gone to their duties: my nose drops closer and closer to the paper as I'm almost falling asleep again.
Walking to and from work 20 minutes morning, 40 minutes evening. Limited sit ups, push ups at home
You could spend an hour or two standing there where new players first show up and end up with a humorous blog post on a regular basis.
Erin Daddea: Everything is great. There is really nothing bad about SanDisk Sansa Clip+ 4GB Indigo MP3 Player SDMX18 .
And we walked off to look for America
As you saw in the video, despite his lack of focused practice in the ideals of the haute e’cole, Mr. Morris only had a few hiccups on his way to executing two-tempis, one-tempis, piaffe, and passage. (I would also argue that said hiccups were probably a result more of an unfamiliar horse than anything else.) Given enough time with that horse, he could probably string together the entire Grand Prix test in no time.
I envy the phone call,
First up, everything is marked down storewide at 40% off: quickpages are just $0.59, everything in the dollar section is just $0.60, minis are $1.37 and full digital scrapbooking kits start at $2.39
“..as a society we didn’t accept these traffic fatalities and we wanted a new road system”, this was in response to the the auto-centric growth pattern happening at the time and associated fatalities; the people spoke, society spoke, and things changed.”
(Actually, the Costco initiative not only shows that our initiative system can be bought, it sets a price tag on it - $33 Million (22 from Costco, 11 from the Beer and Wine lobby opposing it). Now we just need an initiative saying that you can pass your own law for $33 Mill, and leave us middle-men voters out of the process entirely).
3 Evensong 2:53
*Finally, tell the person who nominated you 7 things about yourself.
Anyhow, thanks ladies for a great night. You were all just what the doctor ordered!
Just over four years ago I made a revolutionary discovery. (I’ll tell you how in a later blog, How I Found the Perfect Fit). First, my shirts were too big and second there are shirt makers out there who make shirts for people like me, which actually fit properly. It was a revelation and a major incentive to get on with building a wardrobe.
Blogging is one thing - I enjoy writing and feel confident that no matter how much time may pass between posts when I'm busy and school rules my life, it is something I will always revisit. Blogging seems like a part of my life, the digital evolution of the volumes and volumes of journals I filled in my teens and early twenties. Blogging is about telling my story, recording the moments I don't want to forget, ensuring that an accurate record of my experiences and emotions is available to look back on, to share with others, and to pass on to my children one day.
with a very low tum,
Next on the list: the craft closet and paperwork. Not sure which to do first... either would be a blessing to get cleaned out and organized.
when you wanted love i cut my veins
I think it's just that sometimes I feel very far from ever being able to write the kind of book that I want to be able to write--that distance is, well, you know, leads me into a certain despair. So I return to a place--nostalgia, memory, for me it's all a drug.
“If you hurt her, I will kill you,” the man threatened.
Hearst Castle is magnificent because it combines three amazing things. First - it's breathtaking setting. Lush green hills, a view of the blue ocean, and a climate that can't be beat. Secondly, the building and design is incredibly beautiful. Details? Unbelievable. Even the winding drive up to the castle was designed to tease you, with the castle peeking in and out of your view as you climb the hill. And the third element is the art. This place is stuffed full of priceless works of art. Everywhere you look, you will see ancient Greek vases, paintings by European masters, ancient Roman sculptures, Egyptian sarcophagi (the statuary and such adorn the gardens, as well), but some elements of the building itself are also ancient. A ceiling from an ancient Spanish castle that was purchased, dismanteled and shipped over, then fitted to a certain bedroom in the house. Hearst Castle employs ten people just to dust this place and they do it twice a day. I asked. A great place to throw a party, you are probably thinking. No kidding! Lavish parties thrown by William Randolph Hearst and his glamorous movie star mistress, Marion Davies (he and his first wife were separated but not divorced for some religious? reason and he lived publicly with Marion for about 30 years until his death). The guest lists included Charlie Chaplin, Carol Lombard, Clark Gable, Joan Crawford, Cary Grant, the Marx Brothers, Charles Lindberg, Calvin Coolidge, Franklin D. Roosevelt, Jimmy Stewart, Bob Hope and Winston Churchill. Hearst was not a drinker and worried about Marion's drinking, so although wine and beer were served at the parties, hard liquor was frowned upon. It's said that most guests were on their best behavior until Hearst retired for the evening. Then the party really began. Look closely at the tree in the picture covered with tangerines. All over the property are trees covered in lemons, grapefruit, and tangerines. During Hearst's time, the property was nearly self sufficient, with extensive gardens, orchards and cattle.
I'd been entranced by a tweeted photo of the Autumn Still Life, and the staff at Becasse are happy to accommodate my request to order this dessert in addition to our degustation. It's incredible in appearance, looking more like a piece of art than something you'd eat.
Rice Vermicelli, ¼ packet, soaked in water to soften
The strategy usually works well, and many books see a nice spike in sales for 4-5 days. A few books will climb in rank and sell hundreds of copies within a few days of going free. Some books will stay steady in the rankings for a few weeks. And a lot of books will fall off the charts within a week. Each book, though, has its shot to succeed. For some, it's the book's only chance of ever finding an audience. So watching the sales cycle immediately after the book is put back on the paid list is important.
Much of this is found in Noren, the website, the cover and most of the graphic design. However, the actual illustrations are not straight photography. As stated before Kari loves to draw. It was her first step into the art world, starting very young in grade school, inspired by cartoons, film, depictions from folklore and myth, and the graphic novels by Richard and Wendy Pini, “ElfQuest”.
But to continue with Penguin Crime, here is the next instalment…
I could see the ever shrinking dome of golden energy that houses and energizes the evolved Light Body and I also seen this ladder going from the top of the dome all the way up to become level with the Mesa Cliff (but nowhere near next to the it.) The moment my eyes met her body… it was like the visual itself took to the background and all I could hear was the song of the universe being sung. It was a breathtaking, heart expanding “aaahhhhhhhhhhhhh” that fully encircled her. I knew this sound, this chorus… I heard it once before a very long time ago (2002),somethings tho, ya just never forget. (I have that sharing on my website called “Meeting God.” )
and games.
I'd like to submit my novel The Raptor to you. It's the first in a projected trilogy featuring a psychic detective who works for the FBI finding missing children.
Both the Republic and the Empire are trying to get the Hutt Cartel to side with them. Who ever can win the favor of the Hutts can expect access to the technology and science advancements found here, and deny it to their enemy.
Relapse" which presented domesticity as a prison that drives women
Frugal Fashion Tip
Braised Lamb Shank With Anthotiro
Dear Golf Ball Sized Hail,
Friday, The Ticket – November 7, 2008.
Nails: Taste The Rainbow -Rezlpsa Loc- (old gift item)
The rape-kit controversy is a troubling matter. The insult to rape victims is obvious. So is the sexism inherent in singling them out to foot the bill for investigating their own case. And the main result of billing rape victims is to protect their attackers by discouraging women from reporting sexual assaults.
Many employees come back from the holiday break with a renewed ambition to do their best. So take advantage of this opportunity to channel this energy into your marketing plan. After all, marketing your organization is everybody’s business.
Nina however is not a fan of Flickr, she says it is as much fun as watching paint dry.
Remove the disc-shaped dough from the fridge and, using the heel of your hand, press it into the bottom and sides of an unbuttered tart pan (9-10ins/24cm). Pat until it looks evenly distributed. Now spread the marmalade over the top so that it forms a smooth plateau. Remove the log of dough from the fridge and slice into cookie-sized rounds, then lay these over the marmalade, in whatever pattern you want; try to cover as much of the preserve as possible as you go. Top with Demerara sugar (about 2 tbs) and bake for about 30 minutes, or until the pastry is golden brown. Let it cool slightly before serving.
So, there is the basics. You'll find an oscillator, filter, amplifier and a basic envelope in every synth.
The last family photo (or the ONLY one?? Yes.) was taken when Rohan was 18 months old. Yep. That would be 4.5 years ago. Lamesauce with meatballs.
Ricki Lake
BE MINDFUL IN EVERY CRISIS THERE IS AN OPPORTUNITY.
Cramps started yesterday (Monday). Today they are still here and now I have spotting. I'm only 8dpiui. I shouldn't be starting yet. Ugghhh!
Today I'm at Allan Douglas's blog, The Write Stuff, talking about one of my greatest inspirations for The Backworlds, and one of my all-time favorite space operas. I met Allan awhile ago, and he has been a great supporter and fan. Quite fantastic. And he'd also a great writer.
Our brick has been removed to expose weatherboard and already I think the house looks better, even with the weatherboard being dirty (well if you use a bit of imagination of how it will be with new deck, cleaned and painted).
They are building a new LDS temple in Brigham City. It is gorgeous. I can't wait to see what it looks like finished, but I love the nostalgic feel to it. It reminds me so much of some of the first temples that were built more than 100 years ago.
It is writing.
Him: Yes…I lied…I lied cuz I felt like I loved you . I dug myself a hole and didn’t know how to get out.
Here's the story (I know you are all holding your breath.. many of you I am sure have already this)
About the only place in which a tasteless spring break party could be compared to gang activity is on the mean streets of the lily-white, upper-class Connecticut suburb in which Roberts (who preaches “diversity” for everyone else) chose to live.
Two hearts too stubborn and strongly unwilling;
Hello! Welcome to Day 2 (of 3) of JustRite Stampers September release! We are introducing 3 cling sets that were previewed at Summer CHA in July. All sets work well together, so you may see some of the designers using images/sentiments from multiple sets. Today we are introducing CL-02190 Greetings from Paris.
The idea that my body has been holding on to all this mucus and god knows what else there is coming out, and falling off, tells me that it’s been a very long time since it had the opportunity to clean itself out. Yet, we have a machinery that is designed to do just that. In a normal, healthy body most of these things take care of themselves (although I still think all people could do with a regular detox) but in a sick, obese body none of these functions can be taken care of. I suppose my poor body has been far too busy just trying to work out what to do with the combination of chemicals, processed food and toxins I’ve been subjecting it to every day.
Who are the people behind the Model B project?
And caught a little silver trout.
More news, laughter and plans for a visit
That this old dog kicked up
10.Full Moon
The time has arrived!! The time of good yard sales that is. Yard saling is not quite the same when my mom is not here, but I drug Adam and Amelia along for company this past weekend. I was praying for a good day of sales, and boy did they deliver!
"Yes," said Shawna.
WE DECLARE that, with effect from the moment of the termination of the Mandate being tonight, the eve of Sabbath, the 6th Iyar, 5708 (15th May, 1948), until the establishment of the elected, regular authorities of the State in accordance with the Constitution which shall be adopted by the Elected Constituent Assembly not later than the 1st October 1948, the People's Council shall act as a Provisional Council of State, and its executive organ, the People's Administration, shall be the Provisional Government of the Jewish State, to be called "Israel".
Looking up into the mirror, a hideous melted face grinned at her from the darkness in the far corner before it leapt at her. Abby didn't have time to scream as she whirled around, dropped low, and let her blades slide out. She slashed at the monster, but it flew up and over to rebound off the wall and come for her again.
but since i have gotten some new friends/followers recently i thought i would do a little recap on who i am. and what i am about. or lack thereof.
By the time I arrived in Berlin, my sleep deprivation was beginning to hit me in my favorite way: making me completely hilarious. I could not stop talking to Elle from the second I got off the plane to the second I realized where we would be staying for the next four nights (that was NOT a pleasant surprise.)
The next thing, is use the setting elements. C. L. Werner, no stranger to the Warhammer setting, provides us with characters who often suffer the mutating touch of chaos with some of the protagonist having a tentacle for an arm or iron nodes poking through their skin.
Body temperature, sleepiness, thyroid function, growth hormone, metabolic processes, adrenal hormones, and the sleep hormone melatonin all cycle with daylight. There is a direct connection between the retina (the light-sensitive structure at the back of the eye) and the part of the brain that controls all these hormones.
In addition to his own, Stik curated the work of many other artists in the area. He presented examples from artists of all different styles—and, in doing so, brought to our attention the difference between street art and graffiti: the latter being tag and word-based, the former encompassing all other art on the street. Within just the domain of street art, though, there seemed a plethora of different styles: spray-painting, plastering, sculpting—a sphere boundless of methods. One artist in particular stood out to me: a painter by the moniker Jimmy C. Jimmy C’s work (on this walk, at least) comes in large murals on building walls. What is exceptional about his art, though, is his vibrant neo-pointillism style that reproduces life so accurately despite being composed of, well, dots. From afar, his portraits seem nothing far from the work of a pure realist. Up close, however, they are impressive scales of regulated spots—there is, it seems, a math behind it. Regardless of viewing-point, though, I found the work incredible.
We never wandered into their yard or near their house when he was home. Not only being very scared of him, I also hated him with a passion for the way he was. Wilbur was his name. I don't like that name even unto today. For one thing he was always complaining about our beloved dog, Curly, for no reason that I could see.
Thanks to those who subscribed to my personal blog too. I find this blogging phenomenon very strange and peculiar (I really don’t get why Jezebel used my personal blog as source, but I still love that magazine to death). But, as long as this important message gets out there and changes people’s mind about things, I’m a happy camper.
In an interview with Robert Wilson, Gilbert points out that gendai haiku poets are not breaking off decisively from the classical haiku tradition, that haiku has always been about referencing the past while making accommodation to the present:
mobile computers at a very low
Open your image and select the Eraser Tool.
Put Your Cat Clothes on by Carl Perkins
Master Gardener (3 veg & flowers) – not entered
The santon display was enchanting - it's a big Provençal Christmas tradition to create a little crèche/nativity scene in your home with these guys. They sell the individual mangers, figures and every kind of animal you can think of. Not to mention bridges, water wheels, little ladies selling calissons, even rows of lavender with harvesting workers (not sure how many of those were around when Jesus was born).
Advances are usually paid out in segments. Ideally it’s half the payment on signing of the contract and half the payment upon delivery and acceptance of the manuscript. The key word there is "acceptance." Just because you delivered the book on May 2 doesn’t mean your payment is put through on May 3. No, your payment will be put through when your editor has finally had time to read the book, write a revision letter, received your revisions and approved your revisions (in other words, found time to read your book again). Sometimes (ideally) you can get a time frame written in on when acceptance needs to happen by. Oftentimes, you cannot.
an exercise in prediction
When we got to the Dr's office, we were the only ones there, so we didn't even have to wait at all! (That is a first!)
And we the rounder gales that blow
Popeye’s Rip’n Chick’n
-New Copic Class registrations are up for my CMC Classes on the Road--- Connecticut (June) and 2 spots in Ontario (August & then Nov) are now up at www.cmcroad.com. I’d love to see you…and I’ve added a new “Hair Only” class to the line-up which is a 3 hour fun class on all styles of hair (esp hard ones) and hair colors!
The experience was rich, the food was amazing and the wine was nothing short of fantastic. I highly recommend you visit. I think I’ll be going back!
water balloon fight
To anyone that emailed us topics, or podcast ideas, I have to say sorry. We did cover pretty much everything sent to us on the failed podcasts, but it felt contrived for us to re-hash these conversations that we had already had. So we started fresh. Please keep them coming.
This year is Taylor’s centenary, and I’ve followed the lead of Buried in Print and decided to read a few of her novels this year. Palladian was wonderfully arch, and the narrator kept winking at the reader each time the heroine did what novel-reading heroines do. My favourite kind of narrator.
(Moving down two spots) Tied for 19.) The Muppet Show (Seasons 4 and 5) – From 1976 to 1981, master puppeteer Jim Henson brought his Muppets to television each week in The Muppet Show. The show has been so popular, that it catapulted Kermit, Miss Piggy and the rest of the gang into movies, as well as a number of other tv shows and specials. Disney acquired the rights to the Muppets in 2004 and had originally released seasons one, two and three. Then, despite Disney Home Entertainment announcing season four at the D23 Expo in 2009 for release in 2010, it and season five have yet to be released.
In many ways, the idea of a total annihilation of our civilization due to war is the most terrifying doomsday scenario. Imagine the horror of the initial nuclear strikes that will destroy entire cities, wipe out millions if not billions of people in mere seconds and leave behind an unlivable radioactive wasteland. What probably makes this scenario so chilling is that the possibility of this happening is very real. Sure the Cold War ended but the threat of an all-out nuclear war still exists.
Wolfgang Hampel, author of the Betty MacDonald Biography and winner of the first Betty MacDonald Memorial Award founded Betty MacDonald Fan Club and Society in 1983. We are the largest Betty MacDonald Fan Club in the world - with members in 35 countries. Join our wonderful international Betty MacDonald Community!
Actually, before I facepalm myself into a state of blissful unconsciousness over the incredible level of stupidity embodied by this conference, allow me to seriously address the entire question of geocentricity. I wish to do so because of two reasons: 1) if these pseudoscientists are holding a conference, they are attempting to get more media attention and must thus be countered; and 2) it seems that a whopping 18% of people in the United States actually believe the Earth is the center of the universe (which is far too many)! So here goes…
If 32 machines resulted in a negative financial results of losing one million dollars, if they had actually been efficient and installed three times as many to hit their objective, the Pennsylvania taxpayers might be out three million dollars after one year. The state expected each machine to disperse 35 bottles of wine a day, a level that was never attained in a consistent basis.
Wal: Um… Well, I dunno man… I actually took the step of informing the polar bear that it would be ok with me if she took ove…
I went home, opened the bag, fetched a small scoop and went to work on the first mound. After sprinkling, I followed the directions, poured the water and moved on to another mound. I repeated the procedure and went to another. After this mound, I returned to the first to see how what was happening. I was surprised by the result.
This soup is beyond easy and super flavorful. It comes together very quickly and would make a nice weeknight meal. I’ve really grown to love kale and it makes me feel like I’m being marginally healthy!
Metal tapped on the table top.
1 head of broccoli, divided into bite size florets and stem cut to chunks, blanched and refreshed
- Who just leaves treasure lying all over the floor?
And no one would ever admit it, but Adrian did not…
CBTI involves meeting with a psychologist trained in the method. It is a short-term (6-10 sessions) treatment approach that includes monitoring sleep patterns, changing sleep-related behaviors, managing the sleep environment and learning strategies to cope effectively with thoughts or worries that interfere with sleep. People who engage in CBTI report high satisfaction with the method and significant improvements in sleep.
“That’s about what I would expect,” “The Wall” rejoined. Nate’s cheeks burned. He did not need anyone to fight his battles for him. He looked back at Charlie and to his surprise, rather than looking scared, she was incensed.
The writers conundrum.
4. Pour in the condensada until the skyflakes are coated well.
We loved Tennessee, but we can’t find anything we like about Arizona. Summers in Arizona are much longer and more unbearable than the summers in the hot and muggy south, and Christmas in Arizona feels more like Labor Day elsewhere. More importantly, people in the south have roots, they’re not eager to leave the south and they are generally far more polite and considerate than Arizonans.
Now, pick a theme. I think it is the most fun to do one collage together and then have each child (and you, parent) do a separate collage. When I teach this in a class, I divide students up into groups of about four and have them pick a theme. Some ideas: the current season, an upcoming holiday, any sort of animal, food—the possibilities are endless. After you pick your theme, compose several different poems in a variety of forms. Be creative! Use lots of colors, paper, etc.
Clarifying and communicating our needs before we unite our lives: Whether we want to see it that way or not, marriage is a contract between two persons who promise certain things to each other. Unfortunately for many, this contract is simply a formality for the religion or the state.
This photo was taken from underneath the TPE Highway. Yes, it was a bit dark underneath the highway. There was this small ray of light coming from one direction. I took the opportunity to use the ambience light to capture this picture. I don’t like taking pictures with flash. Sometimes the natural and available light is all it needs to capture the scenery.
She waved her hand, poured herself some water and settled again. That is when I noticed the two missing fingers on her right hand. A chill went up my spine as I imagined the kind of atrocities she must have faced.
A PROPER MADAME!
With that in mind, I made two Christmas cards using the sketch:
If you are reading this and wondering wth I am talking about, read the last two posts and feel free to join in the fat-be-gone fun! :)
Now moving onto an outfit - I wore this to go out shopping last Sunday!
My tea’s gone cold I’m wondering why, I got out of bed at all. The morning rain clouds up my window, and I can’t see at all. Even if I could it’d all be grey. But your picture on my wall, it reminds me that it’s not so bad, not so bad.
Video footage of the incident sees Choudhury set fire to a number of plastic poppies towards the end of the two minutes, according to the prosecution. Nearby is Haque.
17. The brain itself cannot feel pain. While the brain might be the pain center when you cut your finger or burn yourself, the brain itself does not have pain receptors and cannot feel pain.
“No buts, missy.”
-I own: no
at a scrap forum, so this is my card for that.
So Evan, he looks like the guy from Bon Iver, only with thick black-framed glasses and a bushier beard.
Sparks- This Is The Renaissance
“The thinking has always been to hold it before Ramadan. By September, it will be too far and you cannot, for example, repeal the Internal Security Act twice,” political scientist Ong Kian Ming said.
Tuck Everlasting 2002 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
We did a little walking around downtown Asheville. Ate at the Early Girl restaurant (if you go to Asheville, you need to go here). Did a little shopping. Not too much because the weather was biting cold.
He looked at himself and the “financial pinch” he found himself in and laughed. “I made a lot of mistakes. Drank my share of whiskey. Gambled. Knew a lot of women. But all in all, I have no regrets.
A significantly revamped version of 10,000 Things later appeared on the 1986 compilation
My horoscope.com horoscope for yesterday:
While life isn't great everyday, it's manageable, and I feel more normal than I have in ages. The suicidal thoughts that had dominated my brain for so long, I won't tell you how long, are so quiet I hardly even notice them anymore.
November 5: I am thankful for late nights sitting up by the fireplace enjoying the company of friends.
Jeremiah 31:31-34–“Behold, the days are coming, says the LORD, when I will make a new covenant with the house of Israel and with the house of Judah—not according to the covenant that I made with their fathers in the day that I took them by the hand to lead them out of the land of Egypt, My covenant which they broke, though I was a husband to them, says the LORD. But this is the covenant that I will make with the house of Israel after those days, says the LORD: I will put My law in their minds, and write it on their hearts; and I will be their God, and they shall be My people. No more shall every man teach his neighbor, and every man his brother, saying, ‘Know the LORD,’ for they all shall know Me, from the least of them to the greatest of them, says the LORD. For I will forgive their iniquity, and their sin I will remember no more.”
Nothing good, that's for sure.
The good news is that he thinks I can wear my contacts again in a few weeks, but I will need to use the lubricating drops, which I am totally willing to do. I've only heard this in France, but apparently you can only wear contacts for like, ten years? My current doctor has never told me this, but other contact wearers here have said this. It's been 13 so far for me, and while I have had a fair amount of trouble, it's only been since I've been in France, similar to my teeth, so I don't know if it's something specific to the country (too much cheese and wine?), or just grownup lifestyle changes that would have happened in the states too.
You may well find that some of the cutting-edge research in many fields is taking place here in Israel. I remember once researching a medical topic and all the top experts came from the Weizmann Institute in Rechovot. A quick check with the editor assured me that they were happy to have an interview with an expert from here as well as others more local to the publication.
They offer them only Friday, Saturday & Sunday Mornings at 9:30 and they only make a couple of batches so get there on time it is more than worth it! And what's a beignet you say? It is donuts hotter sister, a square of pillowy lightness topped with snowy powdered sugar so delicious you won't know what to do with yourself (except of course to reach down and eat another.)
has her own axes to grind. Hardly a detached nonpartisan, hereslf. But the facts deserve a look. Only then recall what Maddow doesn’t mention. That Romney got a lot done during that one term, creating a model for sensible health care reform for the entire nation. Come on. Rachel, try to be fair.
Meet the author, Julie Papievis, and discover what it means to
Will: there is an enthusiasm gap for Romney
Years ago, I worked with Tony Kaye, the storied director. We worked closely together on a package of unscripted spots for IBM. Working with Kaye was an education. Before each shot, he would get in my face, sticking his beak about one inch from mine.
whether in life
The report also questioned the textbooks’ descriptions of jihad.
As Emily sat there remembering her Christmases past, a small tear escaped from her eye and slid down her cheek dropping onto her knee. Her dog, Ellie who had been lying beside her on the floor, suddenly looked up at Emily and sensed her sadness. She sat up and leaned against Emily licking her cheek where the tear had been. Emily put her arms around Ellie, snuggling in close to her neck and whispering, "We have to make Christmas special this year for Mommy."
More pictures to be posted tomorrow.
But, of course, Democrats paid no attention to the rules they insisted that Republicans follow. Controlling liberal hate is like controlling a rabid dog in full-frothing mode; it just doesn’t happen. So it should be no surprise that Democrats would be unable to control themselves in their hateful dialogue even while Republicans tried to jump through the rhetorical hoops Democrats demanded.
Alfred Blalock (1899-1964), a cardiologist (and therefore self-confident to the point of arrogance), leaves Vanderbilt for Johns Hopkins, taking with him his lab technician, Vivien Thomas (1910-1985). Thomas, an African-American without a college degree, is a gifted mechanic and toolmaker with hands splendidly adept at surgery. In 1941, Blalock and Thomas take on the challenge of blue babies and invent bypass surgery. After trials on dogs in the lab, their first patient is baby Eileen, sure to die without the surgery. In defiance of custom and Jim Crow, Blalock brings Thomas into the surgery to advise him, but when Life Magazing and kudos come, Thomas is excluded. Will he receive his due?
I can still hear Miss Kraus' shoes striking each step as she hurried downstairs from a program they were having in the auditorium to tell me to quit plunking on that old piano in her room. I am also remembering something scary about the coat closet.
Yeah. I've never gotten that one. On and on with the "tell me about a time when..." questions, but never one like that. I was stumped. I mean, we always talk about what we are, but rarely what we are not. Ask me what I am? Feminist, runner, baker, confident, scientist, motivated, intelligent. The words just spill out. What I'm not? Uuuhhhhh...
In the July 2010 Global Market Perspective, however, our analysts foresaw a fatal flaw in the plan. The first part was fine: The European Central Bank (ECB) bought packages of debt and resold them to smaller banks at a historically low interest rate.
When I entered college, I did not know what I wanted to do, and that’s why I kept shifting. I always loved to write, but I never planned on becoming a writer. I guess I always knew what I wanted, but I needed overwhelming misery to wake me up from the illusion that I have something to lose if I followed my dreams. That spell of misery was the period when I had a string of different courses. I did not have time to write, and I was miserable. When I finally shifted to Creative Writing, I was in my third year in college. I spent two years suppressing my need to express things on paper.
We cannot let anything to hinder us from doing anything due to some health irregularities such as constipation. Treatment of such irregularities may costs us that much. So why waste time, money and energy? Sort for the advance method of Hypnotherapy – the simpler, healthier and most effective for many irregularities.
Mothers, this kind of heavenly, motherly teaching takes time–lots of time. It cannot be done effectively part time. It must be done all the time in order to save and exalt your children. This is your divine calling.
the hoeing hands of men
Bear in mind that they are fully aware that those specific six week are those when the summer camps are on.
How much do you think this will cost you?
The Bloomberg administration openly opposed the Superfund designation at Gowanus, advocating for an alternate cleanup plan that would allow prospective developers to voluntarily contribute funds for the work.
Frenchy Land Bier De Garde – We just brewed this one Sunday so I don’t have any tasting notes yet. This is another one of those obscure styles not readily available. It is a French farmhouse ale with the yeast character of say a Boulevards Tank 7 but the French version is more malt forward. While brewing we did try the Schlafly Bier De Garde and we were pleasantly surprised. It was as advertised by the style with a lot in common with Tank 7, the differences being a thicker mouthfeel and good malt complexity. It was also bit sweeter than a Tank 7. Hopefully ours comes out as good as Schlafly’s. Anyone ready for a Farmhouse throwdown! Don’t be scared Tank 7 and Collette, I’ll be gentle.
♥ L-R: Indian Pink, Strawberry Milk, Paris, Christie & Jupiter.
At lunchtime, because I had nothing much to eat in the house that didn't need cooking (no mains gas here!!!), I was forced...Yes, forced to go to the village pub for lunch and a pint of Westons' Perry. It was a nice afternoon, so, using my Moleskine music notebook, I noted down some of the ideas I'd had for the film for string quartet in the garden.
They’re danced to “My Girl” – one of my all time favorite songs and it was so great to actually have The Temptations singing. I loved the Motown flair they gave to this dance in the beginning and end. It was of course, so natural for Gladys. Unfortunately, the rest of the dance was a little rough – she did forget a few steps here and there.
I was then moved to a room in the birthing unit where I was monitored very closely. I was given an u/s Friday morning that confirmed it was Baby Girl’s sac that had broken and it was a full rupture. Her fluid level was considered “low”, but she wasn’t showing any signs of distress. In addition to the magnesium, I was given two antibiotics to ward off infection and because I tested positive for group B strep earlier in my pregnancy. That first night / morning is a blur to me – I wasn’t allow to sit up at all, had to urinate in a bed pan, and was literally left to lie in bed and do nothing. I was given three goals to try and make and they were:
For the first time in my life, I started a race in the back of a pack — a pack of 1,400-plus runners. I'd like to thank pregnancy for this enlightening experience. To be honest, I didn't have much of a choice, I was delighted to be back on the race scene and soaking up the energy of all the other happy runners and supporters. It was Thanksgiving morning, and I was getting to run with my husband. Untainted joy coursed through my veins!
And since I don’t want to get too predictable, here’s a highly underrated performer making a complete ass of himself. And after that, just something for those of you who, like me, aren’t through hating hipsters.
May I also point out that as far as jurisprudence is concerned, since Derek Clark has NEVER ONCE identified a consequential untruth on any of my blogs it ill becomes him to lay UKIP open to yet another Court case they would surely loose, as I have clearly published upon my blogs that if I in error make a mistake PLEASE advise me of it and I will expeditiously correct it and publish a correction.
Here’s what I learned:
﻿Anise essential oils help ease bronchitis, colds and the flu. Emotionally, Anise oil can be calming.
Here is my first card officially designing for JustRite and read all about it below!
You know what else makes America great? Drinking single-batch Kentucky bourbon and watching horses race, which is going to be happening on Saturday. Saturday is also Cinco de Mayo in California, which gives white people with no understanding of history the excuse to make "Seven Layer Dip" and play beer pong in their garages with canned Tecate beer.
THANK YOU! THANK YOU! for taking the time to join The E-Team for our Faux Postage Blog Hop. We appreciate all your kind comments. They encourage us to keep pushing the creative envelope as we prepare for our next blog hop.
I adhered the stamped Whisper White card stock onto a 2-3/8" x 3-1/8" piece of Pear Pizzaz card stock. This panel was then adhered onto a 3-3/8" x 3-7/8" piece of Concord Crush card stock. Then finally the panel was adhered onto the card front with Stampin' Dimensionals.
“A Free and Fair Election”. Is that difficult to understand?
What shines through from these films is that John Cage was an anarchist who believed that “the best government is no government”. In his vision, the concept of living anarchism is neither chaotic or violent but entails the practice of liberty and requires both individual responsiblity and creative conduct.
Getting the garden ready for the plants is back breaking work, I tell ya. Steve and I dug up the dirt and mixed it with all kinds of good things. I can't wait for little veggies to start growing.
Me: Sino po yung nasa huli ?
I thoroughly enjoyed my time here. I've met some fantastic people and made new friends. I've rejuvenated my artistic creativity and am bouncing around the world with so much more inspiration than when I started here. But I have finally created the blog on my own website I had planned long before I created this site to use while I had my little newborn Izzy. Izzy will be turning one in a couple of weeks and I had some time on my hands over Christmas that enabled me to set up my proper online home.
There are many political and social activists who are silenced systemically or who languish in various infamous prisons, gulags and underground torture chambers around the world, in both developed and developing countries. For majority of them, their only crime is daring to expose injustice, to tell the truth, to stand up for what they believe, to challenge corrupt and undemocratic authorities, and to demand freedom for all people.
1030 ***D-XI/5/1988. “On the Ordering of the Moral Virtues in the Nicomachean Ethics.” Basic Program Staff Seminar, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-7, above, pp. 325-34 (1997).)
5 aware
Eleven hundred and nineteen counts later, she was nearly insane with fear. And cold. He had turned off the heating and opened a window. Thick flakes of snow flirted with the open curtains, threatening to enter the room. The man stood up.
Many people would also argue Casino was better, and I won’t stop them, even if it’s not my favorite.
The third reason is when she started saying someday we will be together, I never knew how to take that. Someday could mean anything from a month to a year, to forever. Again, she wanted to be with me but she also wanted to be carefree which maybe she felt like she couldn’t do in a traditional relationship.
Gregory: most Generals don’t agree with torture
For the Turkey Steaks:
As I see that Mr Doncaster is a former solicitor, then I accept that he might be right 100%. The reader can judge when I post my comments on what he had to say. That should be up later today (Wednesday).
My whole being calls for you
The ironic part is that I'm a dog food nut. I've learned so much having worked with other dog people. What most people feed their pets is disgusting. I feed Scout the highest quality kibble in the morning (Orijen) and commercially prepared raw food diet in the evenings. I'll discuss dog food a lot later.
“Corrupting?” said Rothmon indignantly.
Standing in the kitchen doorway, wearing a look that mingled pity with bemusement, my beloved asked plaintively,
First, we knelt the dough.
The day began with the ritual of the burying of the egg. My egg had been dyed with natural material (blackberries) after being decorated with runes. The earth it slipped into was warm, with a delicious smell that spoke of earthworms and growing plants. After the ritual, I worked for a while on the garden. This was odd for March, but the temperature by 8:30 a.m. had reached the 70′s, and the sun was shining gently upon us. I took a load of garden debris to the compost pile and, on the way, noticed the sheaves of spotted trout lily in the backyard.
Hey, it may not be cute, but its honest.
We took in Absinthe at Caesar's Palace and I almost ran away with the circus. In my dreams, I am a gymnast. If you have the chance to see this show, please try and catch it. Funny off color humor that only Las Vegas can get away with.
Besides the main temple of Badrinath there are four other smaller badri temples. These are collectively called the panch badris or five badris. The other temples Yogadhyan Badri, Bhavishya Badri, Bridha Badri and Adi Badri, however, have few visitors. Devotees take a holy dip in the natural thermal springs of Tapt Kund on the banks of the river Alaknanda, before entering the Badrinath Temple. The water of the kund is believed to have medicinal properties.
Markets have reacted by a move to the safety of gold – the only true cash position – and away from the risks of most currencies, stocks and commodities. Major currencies are at all-time lows. Commodities, while down hard, are generally still higher than they were at the bottom of the 2008 credit crisis. Major stock indices, however, are lower than they were at the bottom of the last crisis.
The new verve digi, Numbers 4:21b was used for the card. For the image, I used Gardening Cookie Digi and colored it with Copic markers. My green inspiration came from “going green” = plating trees. To keep the inspiration going, I used the trees designer paper from Eco Park for the card. To finish off, I embellished with the baker’s twine.
OK, I will admit, I LOVE candy....Twizzlers, Reese's, Hershey's Kisses, Mr. Goodbar and more! What's YOUR favorite candy? I would love to know! ;)
Everybody seems to be following their bliss. I'm just trying to provide encouragement, strew their paths, and stay out of their way.
If I tried summing up sweet foods and drinks in Vietnam, I would limit myself to two ingredients: beans and sweetened condensed milk. Then again, that would be like saying French desserts are butter and eggs, which is pretty uninformative. Here's my try at explaining what desserts I did have, and those that were pretty much everywhere and which I didn't indulge in:
I found her (outside) running around in the next-to-near buck. I made her find her original clothes from the day, bring them indoors (to me) and we put on this yellow dress (again). Like I said, it was already in the dirty laundry for the day.
And he can feel my sadness
Plus she sounded really warm and friendly and definitely not scary on the phone, which is a plus.
With any luck, indeed.
E)Excitement
The son answered, "I saw that we have one dog and they had four. We have a pool that reaches to the middle of our garden and they have a creek that has no end. We have imported lanterns in our garden and they have the stars at night. Our patio reaches to the front yard and they have the whole horizon.
He may be very clever at explaining the theory of evolution, but when hurling insults at those who profess their religious belief, he is hardly the objective scientist.
Many of us use similar passwords and usernames for different accounts, and (give or take some occasional trial and error) we can remember all this information without writing it down. However, if something were to happen to you and a family member or agent needed to access that information, would they be able to?
Politically, the voters were tired and disillusioned with the charismatic Mayor Lindsay’s promise of a clean and effective reform administration that would create a new and exciting “fun City”. Rather his policies had split the middle class from the rich and the poor, and undermined the City’s historical economic base. In 1973 Abe Beame, the unexciting organization Democrat from Brooklyn and perennial Comptroller, whom Lindsay had so roundly defeated in 1965 was elected Mayor on the slogan “if you know the buck you know the job.” Although Beame’s mayoralty from 1974 to 1978 would be troubled by the City’s fiscal crisis, for Hell’s Kitchen it would be a difficult but critical period in which events and decisions would lay the groundwork for the area’s rebirth into what it is today.
Ranch lands, pastures of hay or wheat, fence posts made of windfall branches. These were actually called Wilderness Ranches and were going for $175.00/month...yep! I'm not kidding you, you want room, don't care to hear your neighbors? My notes say Jolly Road, Exit 40...LOL!
One of my favorite verses in the Bible is this: ” Forget what has happened; don’t keep going over hold history. Be alert, be present. I’m about to do something brand-new. It’s bursting out! Don’t you see it? There it is! I’m making a road through the desert, rivers in the badlands. Isaiah 43:18-19. The Message
My Crazy Dog Lady persona really was highlighted on my birthday this year. Here is a sampling of my cards:
We looked around the yard for some items to help us make the structure (bone system) of our dinosaur. The previous owners left a lot of stuff back in the woods, so we scrounged up some left over wire fencing and formed that into a basic body. We used sticks for the legs and attached it all together with plastic ties. (It got a head later.)
Like most Murakami novels, 1Q84 is fairly dude-centric. The Aomame chapters alleviate the dudeliness to a certain extent; but, as Aomame is almost continually thinking about how in love with Tengo she is, the sex she wants to have with random men, and the sex she has had with other women, it’s difficult to completely separate her from her role as a female sex object and the object of Tengo’s sexual energy. Aomame may be a hard-boiled ninja assassin, but the reader is constantly reminded that she has a vagina. Then again, we hear a great deal about Tengo’s penis and scrotum, so the repeated descriptions of Aomame’s breasts and public hair may simply be par for the course in 1Q84. This is not to say that Aomame isn’t a fascinating character, but the way the author treats her is markedly different than the way he treats the Dowager (who is old, and thus not a sexual being) and Tamaru (who is gay, and thus not a sexual being).
Now you’ve got to take care of your skin. What is that, you ask? Its stuff that goes under the mountain of makeup so that the makeup doesn’t ruin your skin. (However it hasn’t occurred to anyone that if said mountain of makeup was eradicated entirely, then skin care would not have been such a big deal. But then I’m a business student, and businesses usually run because people are stupid. So, I guess they win. Good for them!)
The next morning we dismantled our shelter, buried our fire pit, and left the area looking just the way we found it. We headed downstream, knowing that rivers and streams always flow into valleys, and towns and villages are always located in valleys near rivers and streams.
Here is the first Lulus Diry-- a droll, detailed and low-key first-person account, with just a touch of fourth-wall noodging and a vast array of clever typos and mis-spellings.
be sure to check out the sites noted under each image for great reading!
Our verse tells us that he was accused of the Jews. That is, they spoke against him. Whatever it was that they had against him it was sufficient to want to put him to death and that by stoning. According to the God-given Mosaic law there were certain commands given for stoning. They were such as committing murder, adultery, working on the Sabbath day and blasphemy.
A2. Dog Face
Andrúm
What is the greatest challenge of being a Senior Commissioning Editor?
But the gravity of the African American world suddenly started to pull on me as much as the Ukrainian one.
I knew what she was trying to do. She was trying to make me feel guilty for making all the nice people wait in line while someone fixed my $0.51 dilemma. And I'm not going to lie, it was working. I could sense the tension of squirming people behind me, all of them doubting their earlier decision to get behind the girl with five items in her grocery basket. All of them duped by the possibility of a swift checkout. They seemed annoyed and angry, so I followed the cardinal rule of anyone taking up time at the cash register: I didn't make eye contact.
A towzie tyke (A rough dog), black, grim, and large,
So if I don't post or comment for a while ... you'll know why.
The bodies of Filip Slavkovski, Aleksandar Nakjevski, Cvetanco Acevski and Kire Trickovski, all aged between 18 and 20, were discovered on April 12 near Zelezarsko Ezero on the northern outskirts of the capital, a popular fishing destination. All had gunshot wounds.
Issa and Cummings also sent a letter to Defense Secretary Leon Panetta requesting details of the military investigation by May 8.
White, hand made, children's tea set.
Every year it’s the same at my grandmas’ place:
Promise of the Flesh (육체의 약속, 1975)
Things really went to hell in a hand basket when Bisou joined the household. Just as big dogs want to greet you by putting their paws on your shoulders, little dogs want to greet you by putting their paws on your knees. The difference is, that a big dog with his paws on your shoulders is way more offensive than a little dog with her paws on your knees, so nobody looks askance if you correct the big dog by a yank on the collar or a knee on the breast. But it is physically impossible to knee a little dog on the breast, and as to yanking by the collar...by the time you've got your hands on it the entering guest is squealing sweet nothings at the miscreant, which makes the little dog jump even higher.
The crowd stood and sang with Kiedis and bandmates Michael "Flea" Balzary (bass), Chad Smith (drums) and Josh Klinghoffer (guitar). The band, formed in the early 1980s, rode the alt-rock revolution to stardom. At every turn, the crowd chanted song lyrics and shrieked the members' names.
As a veterinary student in the 1970s he confessed to being "appalled" after witnessing orthodox Jewish Schecita slaughter for the first time, writing that "the distress, fear and pain were there for all to see (and hear) in the abattoir".
I trotted the half-full glass of milk over to the man, who was now scowling at me from across the room like he was expecting me to fail. I cautiously held it out to him. .
"You are in the giants' cells. I don't know how you came here, but you were badly injured," Derue told him.
is slow in the coming and then just slow.
The first scene involves a gal named Candy (Desiree Lane) roller-skating into the fledgling pimps' office in a pair of skimpy white denim shorts (she saw their ad in the Valley Gazette). The guys slap some headphones on her, no doubt blasting the latest new wave jam, and before you know it, Candy is feign consuming the cock of Jimmy and Jamal's dog (Steve Powers); yeah, their dog is a man (he also makes the ringing sound for the two phones in the office). Anyway, while the dog is getting his biscuit polished, Jimmy repeatedly slams his turpentine estrada into Candy's minimal compact, and Jamal can be seen masturbating off to the side.
Ever the gentleman.
Knead all ingredients, ferment for 2 hours, folding once in the middle, shape, proof for 1 - 1.5 hours, bake at 430 degrees, 30-45 minutes (making allowances for large or small loaves).
Once at his place,he handed me a bottle of diet coke and asked me to wait while he changed and got himself his beer.When he came back in his turquoise blue hoodie and pyjamas,i wondered if this was actually the guy i had been running away from.He was looking so adorable.And vulnerable.
I broke my blue plate, so there will be no more blue plate special (aka: every single meal on that blue plate) but now we’re working with boring white plate. Sorry. 2 months guys, two months. Then I get my gnome plate back!
Where can we admire and purchase your art?
I want you to know I used my hooky time wisely.
4.Salt - as per taste
Velcro watch bands have been popular for some time now. But many watch suppliers no longer give us the option of a velcro watch band. Why is that?
... or is it? The Doctor takes Majenta to one of his favourite places in the universe in Part One of a brand new comic strip, THE STOCKBRIDGE CHILD by Dan McDaid with art by Mike Collins.
“We’ll release it for the first time this semester on Dec. 3,” Fischer said about the fall issue.
It’s readers like him who ne’er fail ya.
I am scared. I know there will be times that the struggle will be difficult. It is for this reason that I want to announce it to the whole world hoping that the whole world would support me with this. I hope you’d join me in my journey towards 180 days to wellness!
It's the same way with Tebow. If you hinge your belief on his wins, your belief is disproven when he loses. It's a bad way to operate (also if you LIKE Tim Tebow and/or the Broncos, you should stop doing this too, because people will dislike him simply because of what you've claimed his team' wins represent).
Assistant Commandant, U.S. Marine Corps (’05-’08)
After being discharged, it was recommended by doctors of Hazelden that Clapton not partake in any activities that would act as triggers for his alcoholism or stress, until he was fully situated back at Hurtwood. A few months after his discharge, Clapton began working on his next album, against the Hazelden doctors’ orders. Working with Tom Dowd, Clapton produced what he thought as his “most forced” album to date, Money and Cigarettes.
You know what the best side effect of running for your health is??? It inspires me to eat better. Why would I mess up a good workout with junk? Until I started focusing on exercise for health, I never could commit to eating healthy all the time. I worked out so I could eat crap and still be thin, which definitely didn't work. I'm happy I've made my way to this spot. It took YEARS to get here, and I will never turn back.
Or shall at the last it be mine to find
The attack on Mr Abbas, delivered in the rabbi’s weekly sermon, also prompted chief Palestinian negotiator Saeb Erakat to condemn the remarks as “an incitement to genocide”.
After the women’s presentation, board Vice-Chairperson Marc Dreyer said he was sorry for their loss. Chandler’s widow, Anne Chandler, attended the clemency hearing but did not address the board.
NEOS generally uses company-owned Twin Otter aircraft for airborne sensor deployment. The Twin Otter offers a reliable platform that is capable of operating in remote, low-service locations. NEOS’s Twin Otter platforms are outfitted with advanced gravity, magnetic, and hyperspectral sensors. NEOS’s hyperspectral sensor package records more than 600 contiguous channels – from ultraviolet to thermal infrared – with a spatial resolution of 3m. The Twin Otter is also capable of safely operating across a range of altitudes, providing the flexibility needed to tailor acquisition to the resolution and penetration depths required by the subsurface imaging objectives.
Prime Minister Julia Gillard announced the early start to be followed by a further 10,000 to be covered in 2014.
2) Training. You can train your dog not to bark out the window by taking the following steps. First, make sure your dog is exercised. Second, place a leash on your dog (preferable not a flexi-leash since you cannot give a proper leash correction with one easily). Third, purposefully create the barking scenario. You need to make the barking occur so that you can stop it in that moment (thus showing your dog what is expected of them). For example, if your dog is a leash barker, walk past lots of other dogs. If your dog is a window barker, ask a friend to walk in front of the window with their dog. Fourth, correct early on. As soon as your dog begins to become obsessed (you’re looking for level 2 excitement–don’t wait until level 10 when they are already barking like crazy) give a calm, quiet leash correction to the side (think “snap” of the leash: loose, tense for 1 second, then loose again). Give the correction when your dog’s ears go up, his tail becomes alert, or he gets anxious. Do not become frustrated. You are teaching your dog a new concept: that barking is no longer acceptable behavior. Remember that when you discipline your dog you are disagreeing with the behavior, not with the dog personally. Fifth, repeat, repeat, repeat!
On the subject of the Design Team we have some exciting news to announce today. We have two new designers starting with us today and I am pleased to introduce them to you - Liz Droege and Yvonne Whaley. Please give them a big welcome and check out their blogs and the wonderful work that they do.
“I’m not afraid of my fear. It’s folly, the Christian argument that you should live always in view of your death. The only way to live is to forget that you’re going to die. Death is unimportant. The fear of it should never influence a single action of the wise man. I know that I shall die struggling for breath, and I know that I shall be horribly afraid. I know that I shall not be able to keep myself from regretting bitterly the life that has brought me to such a pass; but I disown that regret. I now, weak, old, diseased, poor, dying, hold still my soul in my hands, and I regret nothing.”
Prayer: that Christians, Christian ministries, and Christian churches would focus discipleship first on the Gospel, second on the new disciple joining God’s plan of the local church, and then within that context, to teach them to obey everything else that God has commanded
- 1 1/3 Cups sugar
Sicko:just going to buy something ,nothing special.
He set up a culture that permeated the company. Even more than a decade after he stepped down. How powerful? How important is culture? Culture is everything. It will make or break you. That was very apparent in the news this week in many storylines. The Secret Service was rocked this week in a scandal where 11 of Barack Obama’s secret service and 10 more military personnel working with them all were sent home for bringing non-union labor up to their hotel rooms this past week. 21 guys? Really? How could they all be involved? On NPR, one Washington Post writer described it as follows: They are not requiring physical fitness tests.They are not regularly re-qualifying them for fire arms testing. And if they are, the agents are filling in their own tests scores. Corner-cutting is tolerated and a general laxness is allowed. The commentator observed, “These are not goofballs. They’re very impressive people. They are just being let down by their director, their leader.” What is the culture in your agency? Is there laxness? Are you letting them down? Could you experience your own “Columbia?” Great time to reflect.
D - Dry Potato Roast
November 2011 – “Officer catches two high schoolers who climbed onto the Bay Hall roof.”
One final criticism of the book is the over ‘selling’ of the usefulness of Oracle Service Bus (aka E.S.B) for things like endpoint discovery & data transformation. In my opinion an ESB isn’t always necessary. A well designed SOA would use contract standardisation to avoid data transformation and may use a registry or some other form of dynamic endpoint resolution, thereby negating the requirement for the use of common E.S.B features. In my experience, E.S.B’s are often misused or used too early and there is nothing here to caution the reader to the dangers. It’s a bit of an ‘own goal’, giving false kudos to E.S.B’s in a fast moving SOA world that’s learning to do without E.S.B’s most of the time. The section in the book on configuring a simple service proxy in Oracle Service Bus also highlights just how poor the actual user experience is in this particular software application. My advice would be to skip these E.S.B sections all-together, as it will save you time and you can always come back to it later.
The prayer
Thomas W. Duffy, 52, Pittsford, N.Y.
standing over their mother.
FILM SCORE OF THE YEAR
Why did the pig go to the casino?
No one wants to waste their time with a worthless movie. That is, one in which even the passing scenes hold no interest. These kind of movies wear on you and no one will then want to waste any of their too-valuable time even giving it a second glance. The directors know it, the producers know it, the writers know it, even some of the actors know it. Believe me, I know what it's like being in that kind of situation....
While some may cling to you, shake off those that stifle you.
20 minutes. We didn't last more than 20 minutes.
Moon and I jump up onto a stool and perch politely.
Psalm 25:5
Don't get me wrong, I'm not one of those people who thinks that common names should be abolished. They are colorful and evocative, but they don't tell us how plants are botanically related.
Very rarely should something your characters do turn out exactly like they expect. Ideally, you’d want to have the end results of whatever they try to do, either blow up in their face or set fire to something else that they hadn’t intended.
Wedding #1
We’ve been around 2,000 years.
Nice tall cold glass o' agua.
When nearby houses have turned off their visions,
Did I pause to notice?
ATTENTION!! Want to be featured in a Reader Space edition? Have an awesome organizing story to share? I am looking for projects that have made a positive impact to your life. Please send your story and photos to iheartorganizing@gmail.com and I would heart to feature them right here, on the blog!! Photos should be high resolution and unedited. Please include a description of the project, including any costs, inspiration, and how it has changed your life and routine for the better! Oh, and no worries my friends, we will NEVER judge "before" pictures because that just wouldn't be nice! Only love goes on at this blog!
I Feel Sanctified
The Xoom has dual cameras, meaning they can face what you see, or with a quick tap on the screen, capture you as your laptop computer might, so my clever boy tried to switch the camera before I snapped my shots.
Cut about five inches of blue suede or the stringing material of your choice.
It's too high!
Did you know that Elvis’s favorite sandwich was a Peanut Butter, Banana, and Bacon sandwich?
It may only last a moment, an hour, or an afternoon,
Pacific Gas and Electric Completes Senior Notes Offerings Of $200 Million 25
The dumpster reads:
Missing results leads to inertia.
To take a nap when the opportunity presents itself rather than do something "productive" or "active."
In Tower Hamlets, East London, a gang of four Muslim men launched a horrific attack on a white Religious Education teacher because they did not approve of him teaching Muslim girls. Azad Hussein, Sheikh Rashid, Simon Alam and Akmol Hussain armed themselves with iron rods and beat 28 year old Gary Smith into a bloody pulp. Mr Smith suffered a brain haemorrhage, permanent facial scarring and both long and short-term memory loss.
I decided in light of today being Top 10 I would list 10 of the things that I learned this year. This is not to say I only learned these 10 things. I also learned a pile more.
Broken
Why the HECK would someone who doesn't eat meat, and is repulsed by it, give a good God damn about the meat dishes? What we want to know is how the VEGETARIAN dishes are. If we ask, "OK, but how is the vegetarian food there," and you say, "I don't know, we don't have to eat vegetarian food so we've never ordered it," please consider what you are really saying.
WORST PICTURE – Well, let’s start this shit off with the… well, shit. It’s easy to dump on Adam Sandler movies like Just Go with it or Jack and Jill (I didn’t actually see the latter; from the trailer it looks like it would have made this list) but those movies don’t really aspire to be more than what they are. This list is reserved for the movies that just pissed me off with their awfulness.
I took one of those, too.
Here is a quote from The Dalai Lama -
For the guests that want the best paranormal experience during their visit, front desk clerk, Matthe Fink, suggests that guests stay in Room 401, Billy’s Room or the Julia Lowell Room. Matthe warns that if you stay with your girlfriend or wife in the Julia Lowell Room, don’t let her taunt Julia or else she will harass you for the rest of your visit.
Before I started crafting my cards using embellishments, I used a program called Printmaster Gold, the original version. It only works on Windows 95 or XP, but I love the graphics of this program and it is so easy to use, better than subsequent versions. (I bought the Platinum version that works on my MAC but don’t like it nearly as much) I often print some of the pictures onto card stock, cut them out and use them on my cards. I used the scroll graphic from the program for the quote and the greeting inside this card and the other style, below.
- My wife says: It’s finally stopped raining.
What tedium. And I call that playing.
I promise you, my house is cursed. We have had yet another water disaster, third in the series since we have moved here, fourth if you count the mold that was remediated before we moved in.
Formed in 1962 Goldie And The Gingerbreads were the first all-female rock band signed to a major record label. The quartet of Ginger Bianco, Margo Lewis, Carol MacDonald and Goldie Zelkowitz (later known as Genya Ravan) were among the first to break into this male domain. Signed to Atlantic Records in 1964 by visionary Ahmet Ertegun, the group toured throughout Europe with The Rolling Stones, The Kinks, The Yardbirds, and The Hollies, among others. Their first single, “Can’t you Hear My Heartbeat?,” enjoyed weeks at the top of the charts in the UK in 1965 before Hermans’s Hermits recorded their version for the American market.
Jerry and I took a quick trip to the Adirondacks last week but stopped in South Deerfield, MA so that he could go to Yankee Candle's flagship store and buy his aunt a present. Needless to say, I stopped at WEBS, which is just a short 11 miles south in Northampton. For shits 'n' giggles, I took a little video using my Android cellphone. I put it up on Facebook already but for those of you who ain't my FB friends, here's Mar sneaking about the store.
I felt pain on behalf of both Myracle and Billingsley when I read this story - goodness knows how bad they must feel. Thing is, you don't write books with awards in mind (well, I suppose some people may, but I don't and nor do most writers.) If and when the call comes that your book has been honoured, it's incredibly special. It's a lovely surprise, a bonus, a joy - but also a stressful experience, as you're suddenly part of a competition you hadn't expected.
So this blog is closed now and I won't blog there anymore. (T_T)
When the play ended I no longer had a reason to see her every day. But we found reasons anyway. We ate together and studied together, and we were still just friends, because I wasn't the kind of guy who'd cheat on anyone, ever. But one night we were walking along a dark path that led past the Monroe Hill dorms - like she writes - and she grabbed the lapels of my coat and tried to plant one on me. I really, really wanted that kiss to happen. Instead I jerked my head back, and she let go of me, horrified.
P.S. 5/2/10 -- Cornell deVille ran a YA/MG query contest last month judged by Jamie Weiss-Children, an agent from Andrea Brown. She chose three winners. Check them out at:
Tamara Leigh is the best-selling author of fifteen novels, including award-winning Splitting Harriet, Faking Grace, Restless in Carolina, and Dreamspell. A former speech and language pathologist, Tamara lives with her husband, David, and their two sons in Tennessee. Connect with Tamara on her blog: www.thekitchennovelist.com
It may be assumed that caregivers care but outstanding caregivers demonstrate that in the quality of care they provide. They take the time to develop a relationship with their client and can then provide care with “caring”.
Jeffrey P. Hardy, 46, New York, N.Y.
And probably at the top of the list - the trilogy of If . . ./Britannia Hospital/O Lucky Man!
and had 2 grand saved
-that "Portland cement" is contractor talk for "stucco"
Where the monsters and heroes of the past come to life...
-WHETHER YOU ARE A US RESIDENT OR CANADIAN RESIDENT. – this is SUPER important so she can get you on the right list!
Buffalo Bill's Pumpkin Ale
I need no fanks, on a counta I rescue fur lubbs...
Run-Time: 80 minutes
Smith got 42% of the vote his first year (a higher percentage than Wilhelm, Sutter or Gossage received their first year) and seemed well on his way. Only Smith's candidacy never really took off. His percentage has basically stayed the same for nine years. In those nine years, closers Sutter, Gossage and Dennis Eckersley all were elected.
May Whitty Night Must Fall
Photo by I-shot Photography/ Venue: Glass Garden/ Coordination: Ria Madamba of One Wish
Gentlemen, on behalf of the members of the Bombay branch of the Gauḍīya Maṭha, let me welcome you all because you have so kindly joined us tonight in our congregational offerings of homage to the lotus feet of the world teacher, Ācāryadeva, who is the founder of this Gauḍīya Mission and is the president-ācārya of Śrī Śrī Viśva-vaiṣṇava Rāja-sabhā—I mean my eternal divine master, Paramahaṁsa Parivrājakācārya Śrī Śrīmad Bhaktisiddhānta Sarasvatī Gosvāmī Mahārāja.
Wednesday, May 16: 10 am
Of all he is belovéd well, and honor'd much of all. The boy lived with Sir Thomas at his home, Hill Hall, in the countryside of Essex County, where Smith was indeed, respected and perhaps loved by all his neighbors, both for his importance and for his efforts to beautify and raise the standard of living in his community.
I first saw the original Nightmare on Elm Street at a pool party when I was about 12. It scared the crap out of me then and has lingered in memory since.
And other questions about the ethics of personal life.
One way of looking at it is to see yourself as jobless and feel as though the world is falling apart around you. The second way might be to see it as an opportunity.
Tim Lincecum - he's gone from being the Freak to just being the Slightly Odd number two starter. 0 pts
It is easy to imagine this song being about any terrible thing happening to anybody. Could be financial loss, could be death or illness or problems in relationships. Life’s ugly things just have the way of creeping up on us. Or maybe we just do not want to see.
Of course, I get $1 for sending you there (only thru 2/27)
The Etch a Sketch will get a serious workout in the coming months.
Much of my initial years were spent at Balasore, the coastal town of Orissa which gets a mention in the Doordarshan news bulletin every time a missile gets test fired at the Chandipur range. Most of my time at Balasore was spent at Balasore Zilla School and FM College. I was at these institutions for a decade from 1988 to 1998. After that I followed the standard SOP for an English Honors graduate – did Masters in literature and a PG Diploma in journalism from IIMC.
In the US, CKD is most commonly linked to high blood pressure and diabetes. That is not the case in Central America, where people “have CKD from unknown causes,” according to Charles Tomson, president of the UK Renal Association. What many of the victims do have in common – in CKD-plagued hotspots like La Isla and Bajo Lempa, a cotton, corn and bean-producing region in El Salvador – is farm work. That, in turn, has led some researchers and health professionals to suspect farm chemicals, particularly herbicides and pesticides, as a possible source of the problem.
This cushions will all go to my online-shop, but you might also send me an email, when interested in sizes and prices. And I will make much more!
The art above the crib is from Etsy (Keep Calm Shop), an original pointillism piece by a close friend of my grandparents (the lighthouse), and a rusty anchor from a local antique shop.
I get changed into something suitably 'fashion' and we head off.
Characteristics of Leadership Finesse
They have "self-manager" badges in Lucien's kindergarten class. The kids who have their badges enjoy greater freedoms in the classroom and on the playground. The kids who lose their badges pretty much have to follow the teacher around like ducklings and ask permission to breathe.
appointment at the spa
- 6 ounces (175 gm) andouille sausage, chopped
04. Remember Me (remember the METROLAND remix)
Before long, your speech will be significantly impaired.
It sucks.
White Summer/Black Mountainside
I would say the consensus is Miss Kraus was a favorite teacher. She was the Hurie School principal and sixth grade teacher as long as I can remember. She was a sturdily built unmarried woman who was probably in her forties when I thought she was elderly. She walked as if she was hurrying to an appointment - sort of bosom forward and bent at the waist.
Ommegang Zuur
I can’t stress enough how grateful I am to the cosplayers agreeing to my video on the spot. Some of them were weirded out and uncertain of my request, demonstrating that comic cons aren’t as used to the steadi-cam thing as anime cons now are. And that just made me wonder if videography happens much at all for cosplayers in Japan. I need to research!
It's yummy with walnuts too..
Mind you my blog is pretty specialised. Specialised in a negative space way, excluded, preterite, I am the dark matter and background radiation hum of Singapore blogging that no-one sees unless they use sophisticated equipment to find it.
the door will be opened.
I just got it in the mail yesterday and I'm already in love. I wore it to dinner, while watching American Idol, during "snuggle time" with the hubs (tmi?) and to work today with my scrubs. Versatility.
I told her before she went to church last Sunday, and again before she went to school on Monday, that she needed to be sensitive to those we were unable to invite. I explained that she probably shouldn't talk about her party because it might hurt other's feelings if they weren't invited. She understood and agreed.
That’s right, you could just write and sell a screenplay that does the same thing!
When I started this site two years ago, I had no idea the time it would take to complete this process. And I know that “this process” will never be fully complete as I will maintain some sort of relationship with my ex for the rest of my life through our children. Being fortunate with an amazing support group through my family and friends, as well my own personal determination, will be an asset in making sure that relationship remains as positive as possible.
Going All Natural With OLED
What goes around comes around. Believe it.
The Dark Mirror
More Dr Juice to take with.
Baking a red velvet birthday cake (yum, red velvet)
This little girl is the reason we chose to adopt through the state versus adopting through an agency. The kids no body wanted, the damaged kids. We were blessed with Lily, things were hard at times, but I wouldn't change it for the world. We could have submitted a life book and came home with a neat little perfect newborn, but we knew that was not what we were meant to do. We could have skipped the grueling visitations, the not knowing of what's next with her, but we knew there was something different in store for us.
But as soon as the kids are in bed, I pass out!
The deaths of Teoh Beng Hock, Kugan, Amirulrasyid and Bersih supporter Baharuddin Ahmad under suspicious circumstances demanded a unified voice of reason that transcends ethnicity and political ideology.
Malick's going for 'the big fish' as David Lynch would say, and when an artist goes for the big fish they have to get pretentious as a matter of course, lest their spiritual aims get obscured by plot or drive or other tricks of attention getting, or else become boring like Ozu. But in the end, the little bits of character development undo their own seriousness - Brad Pitt's playing the organ at church is undone by the fact he only plays Bach onscreen and we're not subject to tired hymns sung by dusty congregations in fitful slow starts. This isn't the world we're seeing--or even memory with all its weird time images--but an uneasy combo of both, with a biology textbook and Hallmark birthday card stacked on top. I'm amazed I even remembered the dinosaur name 'Ornitholestes' while watching this -- the word coming to me as if from a lost dream of a five year old who learned to spell dinosaur names before he learned how to tie his shoes but hasn't articulated the word 'ornitholestes' in at least three decades - thanks TREE!
If you happen to be on Twitter try following some of these accounts and you’ll be amazed at how many retweets they send out of images after every visible pass over the UK.
Do I really need to total it all up? Authors are saving thousands upon thousands of dollars a year because agents now accept queries and full manuscripts via email. Some may also accept sample chapters that way. And if you only want to submit to agents who do, that's your prerogative. Or you can always self-publish. But please don't email me that you will only submit a sample chapter via email. And please don't tell me you don't have a working printer. The first is obnoxious and the latter just isn't pragmatic.
Stay tuned for more crisp…
Vanvlerah was arrested in 2010 following the arrest of 49-year-old Kenneth Kyle, a California State University East Bay professor, on child pornography charges.
At this point, Ed says he told his daughter she had to stop having more kids. “She loves the children and she wants more. But this is it. No more.”
For those five hours, and probably for the last time in his life, Richard Dansky allowed himself a bit of peace.
Firestone Walker Double Jack
Who seemed from long-continued silence hoarse.
George Bush - Yale Bulldogs
Where she interned: The New York Times
Downy Unstopables or Gain Fireworks $0.50/1
One last convulsion rippled through Ash’s body and she went still in Ronan’s arms. Sundance pulled a blanket over her and tucked it in around her.
CARROT APPLE SALAD
“I find I need a little extra absorbency at night. I'd use a 3 ply insert or a booster.”
Nope. Things done changed.
Initiate Pack ($15):
“Ok… whatever … come back soon! Other must be waiting for us”
I was the child who waited because I had one too many labels, made one too many mistakes, and was viewed as unlikely to succeed.
Happy New Year, dear readers!
When I get into Disneyland I like to savor the moment...we are at Disneyland! You know, like that.
Years ago when a local man was publicly inebriated & hysterical I tried to convince him of his intrinsic value. Don't bother to tell me how stupid that was, I know that now. I was so very SURE of ME & my powers then.
The exploratory well yield comes in at almost 4,000 barrels of oil a day. Providence Resources Plc incidentally also has drilling permits in Northern Ireland. The company is now seeking international investors to help it exploit the well and the surrounding field, which the firm hopes will contain many further viable wells.
Just a quick note to let everyone stopping by know that our Sara continues to hold on as of 1:45pm EST. Although her body is restful, she is showing more signs of it shutting down fully.
I think this sounds wonderful.....timeless love.....past and present colliding.....I'm looking forward to it.
It’s a very good-looking, cool place to visit and no doubt its even cooler to live in, although the house prices will dictate who lives where and how close to the seafront. It’s well-known for its gay scene and as a result it has an almost San Francesco-esque easy-going, party nature about it. Good bars and excellent restaurants sit cheek by jowl alongside boutiques and quirky independents.
The thing is, it's almost guaranteed to be nominated for an Oscar. I hate that. It's stopped being about recognizing steps forward in film. Actually, my disenchanted mind now wonders if it was ever about that.
I usually love Bloomsday as I love racing. Laura still hates Bloomsday, but is glad she ran this year and got her fastest time ever! I also got my fastest time ever. I guess it was a record breaking year.
I am looking forward to everyone sleeping in a little on Saturday morning!
2. Shawn Marion vs. Kevin Durant
But couldn’t they have decided to be 10,000 years ahead of their class in something less expensive, or at least more fun?
also have the right to access, without any discrimination, to
But carry on regardless.
So those are three of my own photos, but now for the fun part! I have been really, really wanting to go to South and Central America for over a year now, and these pictures from this blog I’ve been following make me want to go ten times more!
The second step is a little more involved – we need to set the b2b.donot_initialize property to true. But first, we need to define this property.
We have some secret plans coming up and we hope our readers fall into the fun and like what we've got planned. Keep your eyes out for any weird visitors who may appear out of the blue.
To my knowledge, this blog is in no way, shape or form a purveyor of pornography, but what would a key word search be without the occasional desire to see male genitalia engaged in sexual acts?
He had one voice saying, "Come in", whilst another one says, "Get out"
…I then discover them in the kitchen….they have been used for some bizarre dissection ritual on the unthinkably stinky fish…scales and bits of fish fin, still stuck to the blades……never get a hang-nail whilst visiting our house!.....
In Jasmine Skies Mira is often moved to tears by the poverty she sees around her. The poverty and suffering caused through drought and flood in many places in the world, including India, Bangladesh, Pakistan and Africa, is appalling. If I were to tell a story written in a landscape of drought or flood Airavata would definitely make an appearance because his presence would always bring hope.
added some embellishments using Prima resin & flowers
Anyway, this funny little girl made her way to my scrap room. This is a belated birthday card. I make so many cards you wouldn't think I'd need it, but sometimes I'm so busy making cards, I forget to send them.
I hope you all like it and thank you for visiting. Lesley xx
Let's start at the very beginning: Sweet baby Jacob, born right as 2011 was ending. Since he was a winter baby, I thought it fitting to try this Pinterest idea on him:
*Tools: Big Shot; Spellbinders Nestabilities; MemoryBox die
If you’ve read this anticipating your own BAP, know that God is with you, and that his will, WILL be done.
It's a reminder that the first job of every ad is to not be ignored. People are not reading the paper or magazine for the witty and informative commercial content, they instinctively ignore it. A print ad needs to get it's whole point across in a nanosecond to someone who isn't looking OR it needs to be interesting enough stop someone. The are of course lots of ways to do this - more on that another time. For now it's just about perspective. And stop staring at your layout - no-one else is.
The international exhibitions are organised under the auspices of FIAP - Federation Internationale de l'Art Photographique - and each section is judged by three distinguished and experienced judges.
1) My (bratty) wife, who insisted she be number one on this list
Based on your stories, you seem like a man weary of life. There's a little bit of tiredness in some of them. Why is that? Are you ... happy?
But it’s hard to see what difference that makes with regard to TV viewership.
I would run more risks,
The Tower of the America's is the second tallest free standing building in the U.S., second only to The Stratosphere in Las Vegas. You can ride an elevator to the observation deck on top to take a look around San Antonio. It was built for the 1968 World's Fair, and is located in HemisFair Park, behind the Convention Center. We ran out of time to go to the park, but here is a super link if you want to learn more about it: The Texas Explorer.com: HemisFair Park.
My Latin is limited to such gems as "et cetera," "Q.E.D," which I use incorrectly, and "decimate." Actually, I don't know if decimate is Latin or just an English word with Latin roots, but I know the word. It does not mean "demolished completely," "destroyed," or "wiped out," even though that is how it is normally used. A group which has been decimated in combat means one out of ten troops has been killed. That's ten percent, folks. That still leaves a grouping of pissed off soldiers at ninety-percent efficiency. That's a little different than "wiped out."
His brother opposite him stood tall and wore the ever known armour of the ultramines, the bright blue now darker and slick with blood, gore, and marked by flecks of grenades. His helmet was clipped to his belt, as the rigors of close combat did not lend itself well to being blinded willfully by technology. He held his knife confidently in front of him, almost as a challenge to the man opposite him. He smiled.
when as a college co-ed I lumbered
And this week, we’re offering an e-book give-away of WEAVING MAGIC to one lucky winner who posts a comment! Please leave a comment with your email address and say if you are a new or old follower with Google Friend Connect and what format you want a kindle, nook or pdf . I will email the winner with a copy of the ebook! Good Luck!
I paired this recipe with a simple side:
Wednesday, you dirty-minded man you!
will be assigned a Wednesday, and we get to set the
I am loving creating lots of water-marked blending with my glimmermists lately. I just spray a fair amount of water down first, then a couple of glimmer colours and just let them all blend together and dry, creating some really awesome effects. When it was almost dry, I just dripped a few spots of blue mist and watered down gesso.
Maybe, though, it is considered a maxim by the powerful writer Anonymous that has attained proverbial status and is listed in Bartlett’s Familiar Quotations along with such other gems as “A fool and his money are soon parted” or “An apple a day keeps the doctor away” or “Time is of the essence,” all of which make it into that great dictionary of quotations. So why not “too good to be true,” surely as frequent and famous as the included? Yet in no such dictionary (I own quite a few) does it appear, not even as a proverb, if that’s what it is, an inclusion that would conveniently excuse a dictionarist from tracking it down its source.
This event is not just for gun bloggers, it's also for readers and other gunnies. Special events include range/competition day, show and tell, and bullshitting late into the night. There's also free food, a raffle for several firearms, and fundraising for Valour-IT.
The first thing that one needs to know about The Enchanted El Camino’s continued existence is that it won’t be as lonely as it has been in the past. The new stories will describe the first difficult introduction to The Enchanted El Camino’s future sidekick, and more; The Presto Prius.
2011-05-07 430000
So it sat for a couple of months. We finally got rid of the dial-up, I started writing once more (it was something I’d always started and stopped since I was in my very early 20s) and I pulled out the iPod, making myself a playlist. It helped with the writing so much – one of the best gifts I’ve ever received (though that iPod died a few years ago, LOL)!
add a dash of hot sauce or 1/4 t cayenne.
Ban the hell out of me,I don’t mind anymore.
"You know they're planning to leave the solar system again in the long term but meanwhile Mors and Sola have heard about unschooling and want to find out about it and compare it to their system. Frank, do you have time to chat with them a bit?"
But Mama J gave birth to me.......
Within seconds, the group of ten people, all of whom I believe were related to this man, crowded around us, eager to get their photos taken with us. One person would take the picture, and then he or she would switch out with another person so that everyone could make sure they had their picture with us.
This was probably one of my favorite stations of all. Here students wrote a blog post on Kidblog answering reflection questions with their parents. You can read some of their posts here. Check out Jonathan's post, it is sooooo sweet!
Yes it is worth it- My brother had the shots for his bee allergy , and he does not die when he gets stung by a bee anymore - he just feels sick and needs lots of shots :)
Here in the northeast, with its cold winters, it's almost impossible to raise steers on a 100% grass diet year-round. We sometimes have 100% grass-fed beef available for sale, but most of our pastured steers do eat some local grain — usually corn — at some point in their lives. It's not a staple of their diets, but it's enough to help them get through the cold seasons when the grass isn't growing. Most folks think it produces better-tasting meat, since 100% grass-fed can have a strong, assertive flavor that isn't for everyone. We'll take a more detailed look at this topic in a future blog post.
Despite all the complaining we dads do about our being portrayed by the media and entertainment industries as inept or uninvolved, we really should be thankful.
With his finger tips.
When they had married, she was a naive and innocent girl of seventeen who was madly in love with John. After all, he was charming, handsome, and paid the kind of attention to women that they desired. Unfortunately for Viola, John needed to marry someone with a large dowry, something Viola was in possession of with her older brother being a duke and all.
Inspired by a brandy-swigging silver haired gentleman, this mustard sauce is high on flavor and low on preparation. The thought of combining dry mustard with sweetened condensed milk had me intrigued. When I read that it also required white vinegar, I was hooked. I knew I had to try it. Kudos to Martha Hall Foose for passing this along to the masses.
Much like me, though, our son Kai is a bit of an introvert. He is capable of and enjoys playing loud games with a lot of people, but he gets his true energy from being alone or with a small number of people playing quietly. It has been wonderful to watch him over the past few days, as he has stepped seamlessly from periods of intense engagement to periods of relative solitude, without excuse or embarrassment. Due, in part, to the fact that he has been allowed the freedom to find his natural style when it comes to being around people, he has developed the ability to self-regulate. When he is with people, it is because he wants to be, not because he feels obligated to be. My little boy is becoming a pretty fantastic person.
embossed it with WOW! Clear gloss ultra high. I sprinkled tiny little glass
When did the concept for Guesthouse Paradiso come up and what were the seeds of the idea?
I've talked about it here on this ol' blog, mostly because I've been lucky enough to not get negative comments HERE yet. Maybe you agree with me, maybe my blog is just too little, maybe it doesn't matter. I write about it, mostly, because I can't talk about it.
Eighteen months after fish began dying, Guide Corporation put an end to its dance of PR death. Following two changes in CEOs and one change in ownership, the company entered into a $14.2 million settlement. Guide admitted its guilt.
… with 100 ounces of paladium. I think Tony Stark might make something out if this.
Starseed Transmissions released this back in 1994 (for some reason I labeled it as 2003 (so correct that please if you'll download it) and then drifted off into obscurity. Why? I have no idea because this is pretty good. Maybe because he was from Australia? Australians are more into deserts I guess.
Well, I was never much of a Jefferson Airplane fan but I do remember working security at one of their concerts as a teen and being quite impressed that the band and crew called Paul Kanter "Das Fuhrer", a title he happily responded to. The best thing I ever read about Altamont was in the (now quite rare) Avon paperback original-- The Forgotten Festival- Altamont: Death Of Innocence In The Woodstock Nation, edited by Jonathan Eisen (Avon, 1970) which contains a first hand essay by one Lars Tush, aka Richard Meltzer titled "The Terror Beyond Death", from which I quote--"Some people are going to say it was just a matter of alcohol in the wrong hands. That's all well and good and true, but whose wrong hands do they mean? Can they mean the Angels? They might mean them and in so doing forget about incidents of violence that were going on all afternoon, all morning and the night before, even in spots where a Hells Angels never showed his face during the entire festival if you can call it that." He later proceeds to describe watching a bunch of college jocks pummel some poor kid into "a pile of his own blood and bones". As Keith Richards said "Altamont, it could only happen to the Stones man...."
We had arrived at high tide so the little bit of beach at the bottom of the rock kept getting more generous as the day progressed..
So instead I'll tell you that as 2000AD eases into the second half of its thirties, I would love to see more quirky, adventurous, innovative and clever stories – basically what drew me to the comic seventeen years ago and has kept me coming back every week since.
Marcus: "Whoa! Halt. Back. The. Fuck. Up. What the hell do you hairy lice ridden cocksuckers think you're doing here?"
In fourth grade I transferred to a private school and that was when the shit hit the fan. My differences started to come to light and my classmates jumped on them and me. Those were the worst two years of my life. I vividly remember being told to jump from two stories up because it would be “fun” I was ten and eleven and I talked about killing myself. My fourth grade teacher recommended I see someone because she could see something off with me as well. The guy saw me once and told me that I needed to get some self esteem and to get a “hobby”.
16:00: Questions begin with Dr Chaouachi answering Frank Davis in the comments here. He cites the ban in Syria and predict that the ban wil be lifted there soon as it has caused social unrest and that there are huge protests against it. He said a ban in Iran was introduced and had to be lifted to. He believes tobacco control will meet strong resistance in muslim countries.
And with the thoughts of cushions merge!
I think they make a good display and should attract buyers, but what do I know?
During the introduction to the day, we had an agenda slide which let us know what was in store. I didn’t read any of it apart from the one line I immediately clocked and could not take my eyes off. There it was, big bold letters:
3 The three original experiences—solitude, unity and nakedness—are “more original” than sin. What hope is revealed about our human condition by this reflection? How does it broaden your understanding of redemption to know that Jesus not only saves us from something (sin), but that he also restores, or saves us for something?
And he called me on it.
Mitt Romney, who is seeking the Republican presidential nomination, has never visited his distant relatives here and rarely discusses this part of the family history beyond saying his father was born in Mexico. His campaign team declined to comment on what links, if any, he has to the Romneys in Mexico.
3- While I don't personally let the seasons dictate my drinking choices, most customers are fine with it. One less summer beer on the shelf and customers tend to go elsewhere
They both represent the same things:
Thanks Sandro for sharing your treasures. If anyone else has a vintage hand-embroidered item they'd like to share, let me know. I'd be happy to convert it for you. And I'm always happy to post photos of your finished embroidery projects as inspiration for others. Let's spread the embroidery love!
I don't get out into that book world as much as I'd like to; my work keeps me here at my desk. But I get to travel vicariously through people I've come to love, and last week, I was gloriously carried to or remembered at two major book events.
These patterns are alien in composition yet they subconsciously look familiar as their basic module of replication can be observed in nature. What initially looks like chaos can be disseminated into fractal geometries, nebulous formations, or swirling patterns. These same fractals account for the natural formation of mountains in Tibet, down to the microscopic veining patterns of bacteria growth in petri dishes. Like the Great Red Spot on Jupiter or the suspended Eagle Nebula, these paint swirls and nebulous patterns abide by the same laws of nature despite their man-made composition.
dialogue) on chapters in The Tales and Meetings and other work related subjects. Our experience is also quite remarkable as we bring our questions and understandings to the group at the conference that is made up of various lineages in this teaching. This provides all in attendance to have an opportunity for a respectful and useful exchange of our understandings and experiences.
Morgen: Is there anything else you’d like to mention?
We pray for children who want to be carried – and for those who must,
Tough luck not accepting Time magazine’s ‘Person of the Year’ title. Mark’s a complete loser, and has in actuality bad hair. I don’t even like Facebook all that much. Too abounding aloofness violations. Don’t get me wrong; I’m accept with others’ aloofness accepting violated, just not my own. I may or may not be adage that just to affect you.
“@jack_wilshere: Great win. Great character shown tonight….we need to take this attitude into saturday and the rest of the season! The emirates was rocking”
In later years, the local people were granted commoners’ rights – of pasture (grazing of animals), of pannage or mast (the feeding of pigs on fallen acorns in the autumn), estovers (the collection of firewood), of turbary (the digging of peat for fuel), and of marl (the digging of clay to improve land). Formalised in the 16th century and still administered by the Verderers today, these rights, particularly grazing and pannage, have subtly moulded the landscape character of the New Forest by interrupting ecological progressions and preventing natural regeneration. In fact, the woodland character of some parts of the Forest – grazed by animals leading to open wood pasture – has been suggested as an example of how the ancient European ‘Wildwood’ may have appeared before human intervention, according to Frans Vera’s hypothesis: not the dense dark impenetrable tangle of trees and undergrowth of ‘Hansel and Gretel’, but rather a more open landscape of mature trees in a matrix of grassy glades grazed by deer, bison and aurochs.
around the things of the morning –
Patrick Ewing Jr. F 6’8″ 240 Georgetown
Accusation: "The men who began apartheid were huge Hitler followers." "There are differences as well as similarites between the two regimes. Germany & SA have totally different & unique demographics & circumstances. Does not change the fact that the old South Africa back in the 1930s-40's, under nationalist rule was sympathetic to Hitlers ideals. Now that may not have been everyone in the Nats of that time but definately the kingpins & people who had the most influence in the party." "the old South Africa back in the 1930s-40's, under nationalist rule"??
Within the current trend of CGI and remakes of remakes, "Immortals" looks original and visually interesting. Directed by Tarsem (who also directed The Cell) and starring Mickey Rourke as Hyperion. It may not be deep and profound, but I am hoping for at least some geekcitement.
an elephant fly! Come Saturday night–those dissolving particles
Still, poetry doesn’t
Life is hard. We have good times and bad times. Sometimes we don't understand the suffering.... But above all, it is Beautiful.... Just Beautiful.
i don’t think mass comm is a program for just anyone and everyone.
I could.
You'll have to get a feeding tube.
- Believe, and teach our children, lies re: genetics, IQ and other racial differences, and the real consequences of diversity and multiculturalism.
for the grace of God bestowed on you in Christ Jesus,
*Write some encouraging notes and letters to peoples.
Dereregodzonga
danny: "is that like Happy Feet?"
2 teaspoons rum
5) Organic baby food: Yes or No? No. Organic isn’t a big thing here in Brazil. Fresh and local is very common, and he’s tasted that food. Boxed, and pre-made food is slowly gaining ground here, but it is not the standard, at least in my husband’s family and they’ve taught me how to make their food. I rarely make the American foods I used to because the ingredients are just not available or ridiculously expensive. Boxed cereal runs R$ 7-9 for small boxes with maybe 10 servings.
No real agenda, merely things I like being available: posts that capture, in some way or other, the ethos of what this blog is supposedly all about.
Around the age of 8 , my friend Kerri, was very into craft and so then I was too. So many teapot warmers and hats were made of these long tubes of wool,always in lairy colours.
I now realize I had promised to show you the Birthday Cake my friend Ana Esteves made for my collection.
Yep, this girl is gonna be a first time Momma!
The same is probably true of many other people who come across as arrogant. I guess it’s a kinder explanation than thinking that these people truly do believe they’re God’s gift.
The question then becomes was he the actual messiah? It appears as if he accepted the role, but wasn’t necessarily born into it. It could have been John the Baptist or anyone else. Jesus was special and unique in many ways, but I do not put much stoke in the hype surrounding the idea of a savior. Jesus taught of nonviolence and love. He was divine, but preached that we all the ability to experience God. We all had the potential for greatness. The Jewish Messiah was often envisioned as a great warrior. This clashed with the message that Jesus was trying to convey. So how was he to fulfill the role of messiah without leading an army to war? He knew he had to find another way to be our savior, so he chose to sacrifice himself. He chose to try and convey the idea of death and rebirth be enacting it a most dramatic way. It is as much a symbolic act as a literal one.The problem or flaw in an otherwise perfect plan is that of subjective truth. Each of his disciples interpreted his teaching differently. They argued and squabbled over what was right or who was more loved. Jesus was a patient teacher who settled many arguments during his brief time traveling and teaching.
God’s peace give you strength, no matter what your circumstances.
But I had 3 awesome people join me at the Aquarium. Begin the photo dump!
As it was then, so it is today. Romans 8:28 is one of the most overused passages in Scripture, but that doesn’t mean it isn’t true and powerful: “And we know that all things work together for good to them that love God, to them who are the called according to His purpose.” If you love God, and are called by Him, then this verse applies to you. No matter what happens, know that God is in control. Evil men make plans to subvert God’s cause, but all they’ve done is fallen into His trap and fulfilled His plan written before the beginning of all things. As Professor Clyde Kilby said, “… this world is not idiotic, neither run by an absentee landlord, but today, this very day, some stroke is being added to the cosmic canvas that in due course I shall understand with joy as a stroke made by the architect who calls Himself Alpha and Omega.”
Source: Downloaded the audio from my local library
I loved Silver Spoons until people told me I looked like Ricky Schroeder (I had an aversion to shampoo and brushes as a kid, so my dad made me cut it short). After that, I started watching Saved by the Bell. I had a thing for freckle-faced blond boys, I guess.
12:30 - Lunch Break
Tools: Spellbinders-petite classic oval large + scalloped,
As you start reading in Genesis 17 you will read about a woman who heard from God Himself that she was going to have a child. And she laughed. She thought it was absurd that she would have a child well past her child bearing years. Instead of waiting for God to give her a child she took matters into her own hands. She had one of her maid servants sleep with her husband and become pregnant. Her maid servant (Hagar) had a son named Ishmael. Sarah was never happy about the results of her husband having a child with her maid servant. And there was always a conflict between Issac (the child that Sarah and Abraham would have) and Ishmael. A conflict that still carries on to this very day.
Note following paragraph is math heavy, but suitably simplified and all units are SI (metric) because concentration calculations work a lot better and are simpler in SI units. Even American water treatment facilities use SI for concentration measurements and calculations.
Rose-Marie and Jack R. Anderson
The attainment of ultimate spiritual Peace and supreme Joy within oneself is the ultimate goal of the Masters as described by Maharishi Mehi and other great sages. Although this path is not content with meager goals, it is extremely easy to understand and practice. Progress is certain, although, for most, eager and persistent effort is required.
I completed everything in Super Mario Sports Mix. At first, the game was mostly an average party game, but after completing all the tournaments, I found out there was a boss battle in the game! That just made the game absolutely great in my eyes! I even made an epic team of Mario, White Mage from Final Fantasy, and Slime from Dragon Quest. There's just something awesome to have three characters from different worlds teaming up to save the world.
6) Aw, Hey, Fella Aw, hey, fella–/Whatcha gonna do/When a pretty lady’s/Not ashamed of what she’s got?/Better let her know/Just what nasty names you’re thinkin’/‘Cause it’s so much easier/Than changing whatcha think.
The Thakoon Leather mini dress retails for $3,450.
MUDVAYNE 11/11 9/20/08 @ 10 AM
If Hospitals, clinics, and a growing number of non-medical companies and institutions can institute No Smoking criteria for new employees, then the opposite must also certainly be true for the hospitality industry and a “Smokers Only” employment policy can be no more or less acceptable in promoting those business that are based on providing accommodation, hospitality and fellowship between like minded individuals.
Apparently air filters are a great place to keep nuts, who knew!?
Warsaw Ghetto (Original 12" Mix)
Banksy is a pseudonymous England-based graffiti artist, political activist, film director, and painter.
The purpose of a deposition
John Zorn & His
Sewing places, so I can learn more about sewing. Beaches. Nature preserves. Platypus - I want to g o up to a platypus and say, “Hey, platypus -bleh!”. Car parts stores. The craft store – pottery actually. Somewhere you can do pottery. Sticker store, where I can see how they make stickers, like the stickers we have on your wall and my wall. A place where they make televisions, so I can see how they make them.
Note: This review contains spoilers.
I snapped a couple of pics of it in the shade too, since it does pull a bit cooler in the shade than in full sunlight.
Note the word "presumed."
Fighting terrorism in a democracy is difficult – the stakes are high. The process sometimes may seem slow because the constitution and civil liberties must be protected.
There are two main reasons why we do not ponder what our purpose is to begin with. Barely being able to make ends meet is almost guaranteeing you making it on to the slippery slope of perpetual unhappiness. In order for you to ponder the question of your life’s purpose and to actively pursuing it requires quiet time. Not only audibly but also mental quietness. Fewer thoughts are better and deeper thoughts. That can be a stretch if your brain is cluttered with worries how to provide for yourself and family. Second biggie is that you treat happiness as a final goal, a final destination. Happiness describes a snap shot in time when that occurs and we treat it as if permanent and long term happiness is even attainable. Celebrities get to “enjoy” a caveat of this in that they are surrounding by “friends” that tend to tell them what they want to hear instead of having the candor to say what needs saying. Happiness describes the path and not the final destination.
There are plenty of pies to go round and the situation will only deteriorate if consumers rush unnecessarily to fill themselves up although it may be prudent for businesses and individuals who need their pies for work to make contingency plans in case of shortages.
But of course, the closest I will get to NOLA this year are the beads I'm wearing today.
"When words are many, transgression is not lacking, but whoever restrains his lips is prudent." Ouch. "When words are many" (which is pretty often when you're in a conversation with me) "transgression is not lacking." The dictionary defines transgression as "a violation against a command; a sin." So when we turn into Little Miss Chatterboxes, we're really putting down our guard to sin.
Row 1- sc in 2nd ch from hook and each.(15)
Apparently the exemption is to be removed to “simplify” the tax regime, and black (“or spruce”) beer will henceforth be treated like any other beer of 8.5% abv. This levels the playing field and is therefore beneficial to competition, say the government’s experts.
I intend to listen to the universe
“how Elohim did anoint יהושע of Natsareth with the Set-apart Spirit and with power, who went about doing good and healing all who were oppressed by the devil, for Elohim was with Him. ” (Acts 10:38 The Scriptures 1998+)
West Point Holiday Special ... FOX NEWS ... 10 PM *NEW
This week's StampInsanity challenge was to make a "happy holiday" themed project. I started off with a card, but quickly found myself making an ornament.
("You won't find him surfing the Internet," says Amy. "He calls it a 'download.'")
would have been seen as tender and sweet
4x800m relay team of Hannah Cebull, Megan Lachner, Rebecca Terschak, and Rhema Nicoll
I have three weeks of recovery time looming ahead of me and I keep thinking to myself, "Oh, you have plenty o time to work on the novel."
Some forthcoming Oikos papers that caught my eye:
Podcasts will be released all along the way of its creation to keep you inform of where we went filming and who is joining the project.
The kids started daycare on Monday. Landon is doing GREAT. This class is much more school-like, with way more learning (his teacher was appalled at how few words he knew... this was one issue with our old daycare; it was the warmest, most loving place on earth, but academics were not a focus -- which was fine until now, but it was time for Landon to start learning things while we paid $1,000/month for "school"), and he's loving it. He told me he has 15 friends (i.e., the whole class) and the teacher said she was amazed at how quickly he fit in with the group (basically, in the first 2 minutes). He loves the work and is so excited to show me his sheets and projects when I pick him up. On the first day, I picked up Claire first and then went up to his room. As I walked in the door a little boy ran up to me and said, "Is that Clairebear?!" He'd already told the whole class about her. Freaking love that kid.
Taxi sign in Dublin...He works everywhere !
books above. They are filled with fun and colorful ideas
istvanski
Tami's husband (Pilot) is at work trying to coordinate rescue efforts so I should go down and help her take care of the multitude of children and get everyone some lunch.
Fast forward now to 2011. It’s Robert’s daughters, Kourtney, Kim & Khloe, who are all the news now, apparently.
Now it's Harper's turn, and then I will try again for myself. I have picked out two more patterns that look good in theory, but will surely fail upon practical application. And after I spend all that money on patterns and fabric I might have just enough left over for a new pair of yoga pants and a t-shirt from Target.
“We decided to offer a breakfast this year to offer to families to get them on their way to all the other events later in the day. It’s a need we saw that wasn’t being filled.”
She smirked at me and laughingly said ” Yeah Seal with a backpack…. Now I can buy that…. Hope he had matching finger nail polish to go with that too!”
I've been on a Christmas card making frenzy! I mean between submitting for publication and creating for design teams and just plain making Christmas cards because they are my favorites, I have amassed quite a collection. So...what to do with them all? I mean, yes, I always think that I am going to mail them out, but the amount of postage that it'll take makes me think twice. Maybe one of these days, I'll set up an etsy shop or something. In the meantime, I'll just keep creating them.
SERVICE EMPLOYEES INTERNATIONAL UNION. Research communique: refusal to take flu vaccines – hospitals & long-term care facilities.
1 oz vodka
Even so, Berlin’s mea culpa impressed me. Let’s face it: genocide has happened before and elsewhere. While the Holocaust may be the definitive evil, plenty of other atrocities have been committed throughout history. Yet few countries have ever owned up to their crimes the way that Germany has.
(On one cloud)
Today, she is angry because of unforgiveness. She fumes and fusses about a good friend who offended her. After deciding that she “could and should” forgive her friend, she is still unhappy. ”I don’t feel any better,” she reports.
But yesterday, I really got going and when I checked my time on the return trip I realised I was probably going to set a new time by a few metres anyway, but as I’d passed the 45 minute mark feeling extremely good I put my head down and really pushed for the last few minutes, coming in with a new best of 6.88km, which I was extremely chuffed with.
Crafts 4 Eternity is looking to expand the Design Team!
The Horror Zine, ed. Jeani Rector
To make the labels, I just did a Google Image search to find a picture of the toy concealed within in the bins:
5) Create a new slogan for the city. No more "Big Easy." I don't have a name (nor am I qualified to come up with one), but it should harken to the history, the people, or the natural beauty. There are plenty of places to head with this (jazz, cajun, creole cooking, blues, the delta), but it needs a new feel and a new direction that isn't rotten and sodden.
7. The Green Leaves of Summer - The Ray Conniff Singers
I’ve been using this at night to double-cleanse after my Etude House Light Cleansing Oil, while using my Hada Labo cleanser in the morning. Especially after removing my makeup, I love how clean my face feels when I use this. I wouldn’t say this got rid of my acne, but it did it’s part in keeping my face clean and hence lowering the chances of clogged pores and pimples/acne of that sort. Might be my imagination, but I think my stress-induced-acne and those that appear during that time of the month, goes away faster because of this..
With schemes like CAMRA's LocAle in place, a reduction in "food miles" combined with the provenance of local produce very much in favour at present, it seems more vital than ever that our local breweries be able to sell their products into a market place that is close to home, rather than have to ship them miles outside the area. However, as pubs continue to close and more and more "free-trade" outlets are either bought up, or become tied up through loan agreements, it will become increasingly difficult for our micro's to find suitable outlets for their beers. I hope I am wrong, but I do fear for the long term future of some of them.
1. Regular sunscreen can be dangerous. Three years ago, before our honeymoon, my friend Jessa Blades, a natural beauty consultant and makeup artist, warned me that regular sunscreen often contains dangerous chemicals and harmful toxins that may actually cause cancer. (This article, most recently, made my knees wobble!) Ever since then, Alex and I have worn natural mineral sunscreen, which feel so important, especially since you slather it all over your body (and your children's bodies) everyday.
agrees with me
There was a reference to a query template though in one of my comments, so I've pasted that here:
Economic Slavery is a condition of capitalism, and so it is not questioned. It is apparently a normal outflow of our current system. As long as it works for those with money who are in control, why really ask the necessary questions and take the necessary procedures to actually create an environment that is DIGNIFIED For ALL.
1374 *D-III/18(A)/2001. “Sister Candida Lund, O.P. (1920-2000).” Dedication, Works of the Mind Lecture, The Basic Program of Liberal Education for Adults, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2002(6), above.) See Item B-15 (Projected), above, p. 429 (2004).
Get this …
with a grid and arrow tool as well as parts of
“Let me see.”
The Better Book Company do not advertise costs for an author on their website, simply because they deal with each author’s book as an individual project, and will only quote a cost when they have fully appraised all the details. While I agreed to a certain extent with this general philosophy—I do think that the Better Book Company would serve them better if they at least provided some example quotes on their website.
Called a Man in the Browser (MitB) attack, the malware lives in the web browser and can get between the user and the website, altering what is seen and changing details of what is being entered.
Common things, not great and grand,
P.P.S. I picked up a 2nd hand headboard/footboard for Elianna's bed. It's so cute for a little girl. We set it up today. Pictures of her almost-done room to come...someday :-).
Let me tell you nothing will ever make anyone happy until the landlord gets paid and the tenant gets what they want.
That does it for my first "how my garden grows" post, hope you have a growing interest in the topic and will be back to see how those buds bloom indoors! Thanks for visiting and let's all have a great week :)
you cant reduce Jesus to “just a good man” He is The God Man
One with gorgeous and kind blue eyes, thick dark hair, and an engaging smile. He called to ask me out for the following evening, September 25th.
“I haven’t been hiding. I just needed to be here in town for a while,” Tess said, digging in her purse for some imaginary item she couldn’t find.
OK, probably not. But still. Like me, they’re wary. They don’t want me to write something that makes them look stupid, any more than I want to look stupid by not knowing the protocol of their locker room…or by glancing downward and lapward, which most likely constitutes a rookie-reporter-hazing foul of the same magnitude as jumping up and down on the Predators’ Kittycat graphic.
We live a fairly frugal life in the Coffee House. I mean, you won't find us reusing our teabags five times, or crotcheting panscrubbers out of plastic bags; but if you do meet me in the supermarket it will be in one of those discount ones with huge piles of gardening equipment or children's ski suits stacked down the middle. And even a £5 overspend on my budget at the checkout will send me into a very dark mood.
the best of them,
I take my book and sit in the cafe on this early morning. Unless I have a very long night, I can rarely sleep late, so I left a note for the crew and figured I'd scare up some breakfast and people-watch on the square. In Paris, I did the same thing but at a much smaller cafe to talk politics with the locals. But here people aren't quite as chatty, so I'll be introverted with my paperback and whatnot. I orders up a Dutch Apple Pie and some Weickse.
I have one box that is just for my Epic Blanket of Insanity. It has all 100% cotton yarn and some merino wool yarn. I am going all organic with this blanket and loving every minute of it! I have found some amazing colors. You can see this pictured in my previous post. There will be more colors added to it too! Haha. I am honestly having so much fun with this blanket.
Next, I expect that I have made several mistakes. I cannot correct the video, but please do point these out in The Asterisk forums so that future online students get the best information possible. Past that, the general rules for posting on The Asterisk bulletin board still apply as much as reasonably possible. These rules can be summed up as “be polite.”
Of course, these are my awesome red Miz Mooz boots (last worn here). I had a few people at work (who read Ephemera) ask if these were the new ones, but alas no. Those will have to wait for another capsule.
Blouse- Cato.
Wikipedia tells me that according to synastry a certain relationship is not even semi-compatible, “as a general guideline”. This angers me. Tell me that any aspect of character, attribute or situation of the people is an issue in a relationship, and I will consider it, but- star sign–!
This year I decided to teach letters a bit differently. We went at it letter of the day style and finished pretty quick. This was all in effort create or own alphabetic code that I posted about a while back. My plan was to present all of the letters, one per day, then to go back and review. The thing is, they didn't need to go back. They learned the letters just as well as they did back when I took two or three days per letter. We still used McCraken's Spelling Through Phonics which works awesome!
Rogers (2003) suggests that is difficult to achieve creativity in a homogenous world since diversity is the key to induce creativity; at the same time, it is difficult to create innovations with a heterogeneous groups since communications and collaboration are essential to getting things done. Goncalo and Staw (2006) do stipulate as many others have in this space such as Hofstede (2001) that individualism suggests stronger creativity because of the value that is place in being different and unique while collectivist cultures value a groups setting and therefore, most likely have stronger ties.
…how awkward.
she's working on her rolling skills.
The writing in this book is absolutely sublime. Although at times, the plot drags, the descriptions of place and behaviour are poetic, moving and memorable.
For instance, my current WIP is a dystopian set in post apocalyptic America, vaguely set about seventy years in the future. Writing dialogue becomes more of a challenge.
Shape-wise, the glass flares from a narrow, thick base and straightens near the top. The design isn't ideal for capturing head or aromas, and with its small size it's more suited as a sampler glass -- good for drawing a little shot of beer out of the tap when you don't need a big serving.
Enjoy your week everyone.
It's an unremarkable trip I've made many times, except on this particular trip, it was the first time my mother wasn't on the other end. The last time I saw her, I crept into her nursing home room and she was asleep. I sat beside the bed and waited. I can still conjure the scent of antiseptic and urine that permeates institutional life. The moment when she awakened and laid her eyes on me is an image I pray I will carry with me all my life because it is a look I will never ever see again. The look of pure love. Nobody, and I mean nobody, will ever look at me that way again.
The last two years have seen incredible improvement on this front. I used to live in pain, but now pain comes as an inconvenience only a few times a week. I never think about my pain anymore even though it used to define me. I’m so thankful for the improvement. The man upstairs must have been listening to my parents’ prayers.
Getting back to my husband and his birthday. I was happy to hear from him that today was not as stressful as he feared, and at lunch today, his team remembered his birthday and got him a cake.
It would be nice to think that the worst of the recession is over in the developed countries, and that the emerging economies will continue to avoid a recession at all. But sometimes the cure can be worse than the disease. China’s strategy for avoiding the economic crisis that has gripped the developed countries since 2008 has laid the foundations for an even worse home-grown recession in the near future.
We saw Mary Roach speak at SetiCon (because we are that kind of nerdcore) and I have to say that I'm not proud of my behavior when given the chance to chat with one of my favorite authors. (She on my Dinner for 8 list.) We were sleep deprived and I was more worried about losing my dignity in a word-vomit-explosion of gooeyness. So instead I clammed up and we exchanged some pleasant-yet-awkward- drivel I (thankfully) can't remember much of. I know we talked about how my son was probably the youngest attendee. And then she signed the book to Baz (who was sleeping in my Beco) and that was awesome. She lives in the Bay Area, so the chances of my seeing her speak again are fairly high and now that I've read the book I can avoid coming across like the village idiot. I hope.
Of the writings you have analyzed during the semester, which have impacted you the most – personally, socially, politically, and “spiritually” (not in a religious context; spiritual processes – mind, body, soul) (as defined / employed / characterized by any one of or a number of the writers)?
Texas Seeks More Time to Transfer Mentally Incompetent Prisoners
Any additions?
It worked. That story sold on first submission. It’s the first Sime~Gen published, but not the first written (first written is posted for free reading on simegen.com).
The papers are from My Minds Eye and K & Co. Both of them have similar grid patterns that remind me of sewing or quilting. That homespun quality is what led me to use Kraft for the sentiment. I used brown buttons from CTMH tied with Twilight waxy flax and a heart button tied with twine from Papertrey Ink. I'm entering this card in the buttons challenge #132 at Crazy 4 Challenges.
Q: What genre or sub-genre do you write? Why did you choose this genre?
I had decided not to climb it (all the tourist info asks that we not climb it to respect the wishes of the Traditional Owners because it is a sacred place) but Tim, Dad, and Mum all wanted to cos it really is a once in a lifetime sort of thing. So we loaded the kids in the bike caboose so i could ride around the base while they climbed. Tim is in the yellow shirt, Dad is in the white shirt standing sideways having a chat (when is he not having a chat!?!?).
Was Your power in us
Israel and Lebanon are technically at war but military officers from the two sides meet regularly under the auspices of UNIFIL to co-ordinate security along their joint border.
Bag Placement:
I am a Republican today because it is the best choice among two evils. However, I resolve to be a friend of the truth before I am a friend to the Republicans.
Dinner plate - Bordallo Pinheiro
Always look menacing and scream like a pirate (apparently). It increases your chances of breaking the chains of love. The only couple worse than the non stop hand holding walkers are the ass holding walkers (extra demerits if the hands are actually down the back of the pants). If you are a part of an ass holding couple, please break up, then wash your hands.
Dave, Pam, and I enjoyed eating lunch at the historic lodge at Multnomah Falls. The lodge was completed in 1925. Besides the restaurant, the lodge contains a state park information center and a gift shop.
To that, we might answer: Was it ever realistic to suppose that a single man, one moreover in jail from his 40s through to his 70s (and suffering a bad case of Karl Marx disease), could deliver a democratic, free market society enjoying harmonious multicultural democracy, even supposing he had so wished?
* Because these cookies are thin, the bottoms will brown more quickly than the top, so even though they may not seem dark enough at 20 minutes, test one to see. You can experiment, too, with a higher oven rack position. They will harden as they cool, too. You could also roll them thicker for a more substantial cookie, increasing the baking time incrementally.
For anyone else that had a rough day lately, let's agree to not let yesterday take up too much of our time, and let's make today better.
8 Heartbreak Radio
There are two business topics that seem to bring out the best and (yes) the worst in executives: 360º feedback and performance reviews.
everything will be just fine
The main stage production of Kaufman and Hart's You Can't Take It With You, directed by John Glass followed. It also was greeted by an appreciative audience that was entertained by both the antics on the stage and the special effects emanating from back stage. Since The Ancient One was in the cast, Milton Chen graciously agreed to take pictures, 2 of which follow (with a plan to bring forth more at a later date).
Gilmartin continues: Looking to the Future
If nobody else tells you today, YOU ARE BEAUTIFUL! Now go be fabulous!
is put up on the boardwhen it's their birthday. This was for our summer birthdays.
Story wise is where it starts falling apart for this movie, while still very entertaining it does stop the movie from ever truly excelling. First off the Simza (Rapace) story line just doesn’t really work, as the entire things seems forced and just an excuse to put a female in the movie. Moriarty’s plan is interesting but for all the build up from Holmes it doesn’t really live up to the hype. Finally we come to the final one minute of the film. Of course I’m not going to spoil it but it pissed me off. I thought we were getting a perfect ending, or at least one that befits a Holmes tale that has Moriarty, and yet it really doesn’t follow through.
- It's $10 less this year...wristbands will be $129.
Before I ever read about Kipling's daemon, I had learned that all that was best in my writing was not mine. I didn't invent it – rather it was put into my head. Indeed, I couldn't invent it – I had tried. Any plot or situation I invented was tired, trite, and petered out for lack of enthusiasm on my part. The best writing always came 'out of the blue'. Slowly I became aware of that Other, who sometimes seemed to be slightly behind me, leaning over my right shoulder.
“The only thing I have against money is that the people who have it are so crass and unimaginative about what they do with it.”
Then...I don't know, but maybe I relaxed enough, let the wind blow through my hair. Had a little fun choosing new backgrounds for a couple of blogs (like this one???), and working with another writer friend who is teaming up with me on the aforementioned blog.
Your birth chart shows how you’re wired for attitudes about money, your earning capacity and your self-worth. In this special 30-minute reading you will learn your code and how to work with it consciously — and express it in other ways other than what you’ve always been doing. $90. Info and booking here.
Zoe Strauss’ exhibit, located throughout the city of Philadelphia as billboards with her work strategically positioned in neighborhoods and business districts as well as in the Philadelphia Art Museum, is a materialization of these utterances and the memories of those left along the margins of our society. The identity of these individuals, as just that, individuals, via this display, has created a psycho-geography of sorts out of the cityscape as their stories inscribe their-story (as opposed to his-story) along billboards that dot the sky. The contrast of these images can be jarring as you pass the hopes and dreams of these individuals and the falling out of those same dreams against the progressive utopic skyline of a area betting everything on becoming “America’s next great city”. Zoe is calling for a reading of the lives of the individuals she documents – people she has lived with and befriended – to disturb those walking by. To wake them up. Calling attention to the artistry of these people and the environment that many blindly walk through as these people, trembling and hungry, stand to make up the foundation of our society. Kafka’s melancholic style, resultant of the hyper industrialization of the times he lived in makes plenty of commentary on these facts. His Hunger Artist is evocative of his resentment of the times. “When . . . some leisurely passer-by stopped . . . and spoke of cheating, that was in its way the stupidest lie ever invented by indifference and inborn malice, since it was not the hunger artist who was cheating, he was working honestly, but the world was cheating him of his reward”[1]. Zoe attempts to show the failings of this society in a very human way. To show that society has cheated that which it was meant to protect and afford the right to live. For isn’t the mainstay of our culture supposed to be the pursuit of life, liberty, and happiness. Most importantly to life?
5) Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs was sneak previewed to College Students in 1937 who left halfway during the film causing Disney great despair. It turned out the students had to leave early because of dorm curfew.
Since it was going into the bedroom I've been working on, I wanted to freshen it up a bit. I gave it a coat of a deep grey paint (Debbie Travis Jet Set). While I loved the color, the paint didn't seem to want to dry. You can read about those troubles here.
However, there is some awesome material in store for you, if you're patient, including some of the best interviews on the site yet. These include conversations with Ole Bouman, Jeffrey Inaba, Mark Wigley, and Academy Award-winning film editor and sound mixer Walter Murch, all ready to go up in about a week.
And to all of you, my most lovely readers, may 2012 be filled that laughter too!
I felt the same way for a long time, but lately research has been coming out saying somewhat the opposite. Some saturated fats actually have beneficial health properties that can INCREASE your high density lipoproteins (HDL); or the GOOD fat.
According to a study by the University of Chicago's Tang Center for Herbal Medicine, green tea contains properties that control appetites and body weight, reducing body weight by 21%. In a 1999 study published in the American Journal of Clinical Journal, men who took daily 3 cups of green tea were able to burn 80 more calories per day, which adds up to a 20,200 calories in a year. This, according to the study, translates to a loss of 8 pounds in one single year without making any lifestyle or diet changes! 8 pounds of weight loss per year may not be a lot, but imagine how much more weight you can lose if you take additional servings of green tea with exercise and a healthy lifestyle! The possibility is endless. What's more, in a 2005 study published in the Annals of Nutrition and Metabolism, green tea can actually reverse established obesity!
Have you done this? Do you solve this problem by just always bringing your knitting with you? Do you think about what your day holds and decide whether or not to bring your knitting based on that?
The layers needed a little extra distressing, so I used the Torn Frames technique from Technique Junkies on the white and brown layers. I love the contrast of this rustic, tattered feel with the elegant, glittery ornaments.
Thankfully, she slept pretty well. She woke up at 4 and I tried to just give her water. But then she was fussy and really, the last time she had eaten was 6:45. So I gave her a feeding, changed her diaper and then she didn’t want to go down. Finally, she went back down close to 5.
Maybe now I will no longer attempt to fit a mold that will never work.
Not necessarily—just that there’s a way in which your work seems to circle somehow back to some of these things, certain geographies. I don’t know if that makes sense.
Your Score: 1
Hyouka is the final piece of our Spring 2012 picture. It’s a KyoAni series directed by Takemoto Yasuhiro, who also directed Suzumiya Haruhi no Shoushitsu, one of our favorite films period, anime or not; and his touch is evident here. Fist of all, the quality of the animation and attention to detail are first-rate; this is perhaps the best-looking series of the Spring. Hyouka is also conspicuous in its overall calm, quiet, natural atmosphere. This is a world that looks and feels very real. Hyouka’s protagonist Houtarou is not immediately likeable, however. He’s a noncommital, unmotivated misanthrope, and his friend Fukube is a bit of an annoying smartass.
And, what many people don’t realise about employee ownership is that it is a hugely underused tool in unlocking growth.
In the next segment, we will look at the importance of naval intelligence during the US Civil War.
My neighbour, M, makes meethe chaawal during Navratri, Diwali and other festivals. My version is a vegan and low-sugar version, and I make it at the slightest pretext - rainy days, Sundays, weekdays, sudden guests, whatever! I warned you - I am addicted. And I would love you to get as addicted as I am.
It meant though, that I had a steep learning curve, as I started finding out about this strange new world of publishing. It’s been a journey of discovery that I’ve thoroughly enjoyed, I’ve read great books, made brilliant new friends and found much to talk and think about.
What this means is not only did I get a $5.00 Gift Certificate for Digi's With Attitude! Store but now I can say that like me "My Blog's got attitude !" lol
And now, let's welcome Cecilia to the blog!
out of nothing and wrote the rules for this heinous and sickening
There, I’ve just saved you from needing to read The Rabbit Proof Fence………..
(Yo! you ready for this?)
Which brings me to, I really hate being 40. I thought I would handle it
This is from long ago. One “Small Table Game Day” when my gf and I played a couple of Warmachine games (already somewhere in the blog) and in between those we played a quick LotR game. The scenario is one from the Khazad-dum book and has dwarves protecting the giant mountainside door mechanism so goblins cannot enter from the other side. I ran the goblins trying to open the gates while she ran the dwarves.
An advantage for AY?
Lastly, thanks again for all of your prayers & support over the last 9 months of our pregnancy. We’re so thankful for all of our family & friends!
FAAN, and the company claimed to have made a part payment to a third
Sometimes I spend forever on one-layer cards, but this was one of those rare cards that just came together super fast. I used a Close to My Heart set that I picked up at a friend's garage sale last summer. The ink is Brilliance lightning black, so it has a fabulous shimmer to it that looks lovely against the cream base. I added two little pearls for my bit of bling.
As human beings in a broken world, we all face things that we find fearful; circumstances for which we have absolutely no control, nor the ability to gain control to determine the outcome. It is in this place that we must decide – Will I trust God?
Last year Deniz Kurtel burst into the popular consciousness with her debut album “Music Watching Over Me” on trendsetting label Crosstown Rebels, earning critical praise for her totally fresh take on house music, and bewitching live audio visual club shows. 2012 will see her once again captivating audiences with her musical
Lord Fuckington drank deep. The reception he had received on his entrance was much more fitting his station and he had all but forgotten the odd stable boy. He had been addressed respectfully and given everything he had asked for, the best meat and an endless supply of ale and mead. His table overlooked the entire inn, a respectful distance from the ruckus ways of the peasants but not so far away that he couldn’t appreciate their frivolity. It was the kind of occasion where he enjoyed their presence, whilst they drank away their miserable existences and pretended for a time that they mattered. It was an act put on for his benefit, a play with multiple recurring parts put on for an audience of only he. He was certain that if he wasn’t there to watch that they would all be lolling about drowning in sorrow and drink. But, oh, when a Lord or Lady was in attendance, then it was time to rejoice. Without him and his kind their lives would be completely without meaning. He took great pleasure in the thought. He took in the sight greedily. Sated with food and drink it was time to seek out another pleasure. The female attendants, alas, were largely displeasing to the eye, and the men not much better. Besides, after his run in with the doe it was a woman he craved. If he had to have one of these plain looking creatures, as long as they were not terribly, terribly ugly, he would have to be content. He would still take his pound of flesh and more and it was within the flesh, in all its form and potential, that lay the ultimate pleasure, to make no mention of what lay beneath.
Optimizing for handsets can be tricky if your designs currently use all of a large screen to deliver content. It’s worth the effort, though, because Ice Cream Sandwich brings the Honeycomb APIs to handsets and you’ll significantly increase the user-base for your app. Using a single APK for all devices also simplifies your updating and publishing process and makes it easier for users to identify your app.
them and make them matter,
Mr. K
Love the roof top gardens
I have been in southern California working and not painting. I so miss painting and hope to return soon to the studio for, "A Painting Day".
I posted the following “page” in early December… The words were written by hugmamma, on her blog “body, mind and soul.” I gain such continuing inspiration, value and courage from hugmamma’s words….so I’m reposting them again today….as a Friday wish for us all…a gift to us all from hugmamma….
This month, 10 years after her Verón’s disappearance, seven men and six women accused of having been part of the network that kidnapped and forced her daughter into prostitution are finally being brought to trial.
We put gravel down because it was too muddy. It has been nice so far with all the dogs.
The lady of the house
1. Houston Texans
*Sparkles - Diamond ice stickles
5. I love things that are tiny. Especially if they are incredibly detailed. Look at the photo above, that little feast is made of polymer clay, and is barely larger than a penny. I can craft most things that I come across without much difficulty, but I’m horrible at working with clay and when I see things like this I think that they may as well have been made with magic. The photo links to more tiny pieces of art.
The battle reached a fever pitch about a week ago when a judge threw out a corruption case against Zuma and suggested there had been high-level political meddling in his case.
I got those cute little stickers from here to document this pregnancy. I won't be taking belly pictures weekly like last time. The stickers are for every 4 weeks starting at week 12 and then at week 30 it's every 2 weeks. So that's when I'll take and share belly pics with you. :) The site where I got the stickers also has them for babies with each month on it, so cute! Search for a coupon code if you want to get some, it saved me a few bucks.
6. Learn To Fly…I am finally starting to see the importance of this in my life.
We got chicks! And boy are they cute! We got one Rhode Island Red named Ginny (from a book series called Harry Potter), one Black Austrolorp named Minerva McGonigal(again, from Harry Potter) one Turken (it looks like a buzzard!) named Sybill Trelawney (yes, you guessed it: it's from Harry Potter too) and one Buff Orpington that will be biggest of all named Madame Maxime(all of the names are from Harry Potter.)
Anyways back to the Jade Forest….
When I asked him to walk on in the opposite direction, he was on his toes, but fine, although he could hear some noise round the next bend, and we tiptoed past some workmen unloading a van.
I love "The Fields Of Athenry"
Three of the four books I named are being ordered!
And thus other games began to be discussed. While factions in the group are interested in some titles we hope to see later this year (i.e. Star Wars: The Old Republic and Guild Wars 2), we needed something to bridge the gap.
i'll be posting and commenting again!
We first tried our hand at gardening 2 years ago and had some success (with things like tomatoes and beans) and not so much with others (like pumpkins and corn). Well, it’s time to turn that around; not only am I going to grow enough vegetables to make my own salad, but I’m going to apply my year of master planning projects at Drexel and put it to good use. Well, on a small scale at least.
Relight Rule No. 8: Let's get practical — in discussing trying again have you both made suggestions of what might help make it work this time? It's all well and good thinking you can rekindle your love — and that love will conquer all — but it won't. As well as realising you still love each other, you both must think practically about what things you should do differently.
food:
And in related news, I have agreed to write and present next week’s quiz. Naturally the whole thing has been collated already with some reference to my question bank archive (but not much). Alas I cannot reveal much about the quiz for fear of giving unfair advantage but I can state that there will be not one but two picture rounds.
Maybe we could accuse Fergus of cheating by bringing a tag team, especially when its these two. But either one wipes the floor on its own. Broadside with the Suffolk Gold is magisterial. Innovation with Mrs Temple's Alpine is simply perfect.
The son of a star is a star.
Did I mention in some parts of Oklahoma the high on Sunday was close to 109? This state does not mess around when it comes to heat.
In related news, find out the loudest animal in the world, listeners send in their animal related horror stories (most of which seemed to revolved around the same zoo funny enough!), and there are 3 bacon related taste tests on offer, courtesy of Dan the bacon man.
in my Thich Nhat Hanh calendar
Neuroreport. 2002 Oct 7;13(14):1715-20. Related Articles, Links
grrl+dog Actually my own.... if have to be un ashamedly honest.. I love my little bloggy. I can see my head and what is in it..I can see stuff that I do and it is "out there" my own little play world. But that's not going to go down well, so it would have to be that amazing crab apple chick, Art tea Life. Her stuff is fresh, contemporary and 5 minutes from now, which I like, oh and she also gives fantastic photoshop tutorials for dummies... me. http://arttealife.blogspot.com/
It's gonna make you want to coo and squeal. Especially if you're female. Somehow there's a program we're born with that when we see something this small and cute our voices go up several octaves. In some cases so high only dogs can hear them.
Elf ... USA ... 8 PM
Here are the other fantastic bloggers who are participating in the blog hop!
5. Skinny does not equal sexy.
Beau had his favorites: peanut butter, chasing birds, barking at the ripples in the pool water, begging for fruit and veggies, his stuffed toys always neatly piled in the living room, and of course his beloved “cookies” (dog biscuits) from Trader Joe’s. He had his un-favorites, too: getting his ears cleaned, strangers coming to the house, and being left alone during the day. I’ll never forget the bark that was bigger than his bite, his sweet licks on my face, and the way his tail wagged a million miles a minute when I came home.
Some Stats from the latest Google survey for 2014:
"While the Minister does make a delicious quiche using African potatoes, garlic, beetroot, olive oil, denial, belligerence and lingering death, President Motlanthe has indicated that his culinary tastes tend toward more ascetic dishes."
In a large bowl, cream the butter and sugars. Add the eggs, one at a time and mixing between each addition, the vanilla, corn syrup, baking soda, and peanut butter. Mix well until smooth. Add the oats and mix well, scraping the sides of the bowl. Add the chocolate chips and mix until they are evenly distributed throughout the batter. Then add the M&M's and mix well.
I was active,I remain active not to leave space for thoughts.
As I’ve been reading it one of my dominate thoughts has been that I don’t believe these men would be so successful if women didn’t secretly or subconsciously want to be seduced. And, if we females are honest, maybe we aren’t so unaware of the desire. Women want to feel desirable. Even those of us who claim to have too much self-esteem and self-worth to resort to turning ourselves into sex symbols still want to be seen that way once in a while. Related to that, I think we want to feel worthy of seduction, even if worth really has nothing to do with it.
None of this was given to us, brothers and sisters. We fought for every single bit of what we now have. And those that pioneered the struggle got the least out of it, and suffered the most pain.
I cook. I clean. I do laundry. I handle a bunch of clients. I manage a bunch of writers who handle a bunch of clients. I write proposals. I teach. I promote my company, technical writing in Israel, Israel in general. I organize national conferences and bake 600 cookies (shouldda been 800 but couldn't keep going). I organized a bat mitzvah and did most of the cooking and baking and now I'm planning (okay, they're doing most of it themselves, but I'm in pity-mode, so bear with me here) this upcoming wedding. And worst of all, Passover is coming and I HATE Passover.
Rod Stewart: I Used To Love Him, But It’s All Over Now
When I reached the end of painting them, i had maybe three tablespoonsful of paint left over. I mixed that with a little ordinary black acrylic to get a soft gray, and hand painted their "Grammie names" on the seats. Finally, I finished everything with two coats of Minwax Polycrylic...knowing full well that these little things will get a great deal of wear (lol).
It’s not very funny
Now for the not so chemically literate that means that as glutamine is ejected from fish, it reacts with water to form glutamate ion and ammonium ion. The glutamate then reacts with hydrogen ions to form glutamic acid.
Even after all of your self-editing, and I am still struggling mightly with this, nothing beats a real person reading and commenting on your story. There are some on-line critique sites that are worth the effort to become involved and stay involved with. Nothing beats finding a critique partner that is willing to not pull punches and work with you.
Add the corn in with the bacon and renderings, salt and pepper too. Bring to a simmer and slowly add the cream and milk bringing back to a boil. Taste and add sugar if desired.
(post comment content)
3. Share a tip for party goers- if you have one (it can be an additional idea for any of the blog party posts, an idea for my tutorial, how to get the most of a blog party, how to print tutorials, etc.) Anything you can think of...
10. Animal Arithmetic
Twelve days in the UK had me taking quite a lot of things for granted. Now back to reality. Summer has arrived with a vengeance. From cold and rainy England, I was suddenly transported to temperatures up near 30 degrees.
naked DAD clock: Kaiser Craft
for my card I've made it for Kay as this Kenny K image is just so her lol,
I spent a lot of time in the garden battling back the over growth that should have been sorted in April, I used to do all the gardening myself but now I've enlisted the help of R & A who do all the grunt work, which saves my back for all the other stuff. I do love my garden, the soil must be good here as everything I plant grows like crazy!
During the interview but especially after, we talked about her late husband. I told her how much I admired so many of his performances, as one example pointing to his lovely monologue in The Magnificent Ambersons (1942) about the coming of automobiles and their impact on society. She gave me a little tour of their place, relating stories tied to various paintings, sculptures, and other mementos. I recall admiring one particular sketch or painting of Cotten to which Medina replied, “Oh, Orson did that one.”
I’ll now hide under a rock.
Tales of adversity, resilience and youthful high spirits are woven together to provide a moving insight into a lost way of life, as well as a timeless testament to the experience of being young and female.
42. Screwfly Solution
Saute the spinach in a large non stick skillet to cook out additional moisture, adding minced garlic after a few minutes. Remove spinach to the bowl of the food processor and allow to cool while preparing the rest of the ingredients. Saute the diced onion and mushrooms until nicely browned, put in mixing bowl. Slice the carrot into coins and add to pan with a sprinkling of water. Cover and allow to steam for 2-3 minutes. Add to mixing bowl. Dice peeled and seeded roasted red pepper in a large dice (about 1/2 inch square) and add to mixing bowl. Add zatar or other seasonings and stir to combine all.
I wish you a very healthy and prosperous New Year.
this is new, but along with my "verdict" endings, I want to introduce a learning ending as well, because as a beginner baker hoping to make it pro, it only makes sense that I document my tricks of the trades, and hopefully in the sharing process, others can save time and money too! so today, while making this exquisite little southern treat, I actually learned a few new things even after having made this dessert at least a dozen times. for one, instant boxed pudding is completely unnecessary. i hope you at least try this recipe once to see for yourself. second, i alwaysss used to get cooked eggs in my batter. yuck. it was such a nightmare, that sometimes I even had to start over. well whisk the darn ingredients together first before going stove top, duh! lastly, whilst making the whip cream in my handy dandy (ok it is Granny's) KitchenAid, I realized low-medium speed gets you whip cream the texture of ReadyWhip found at supermarkets, while medium-high speed gets a supremely rich and dense creamy texture that is great for the cream needed to fold into the custard (a la Magnolias Bakery in NYC). so there ya go!
At the same time, comments began to creep into the letters page in the East Kent Gazette about sightings of Eastern-European looking individuals who were loitering on street corners and threatening passers-by. Asylum seekers, or people seeking political asylum, had become the latest pariah even to the point of taking on the role, charted down the ages, of modern day hooligans.²
It's a beautiful Spring day here in Northern Illinois, this girl is going to get herself outside!!!
Of insidious intent
onion 1 medium sized or 2 small
“Follow her,” the dour man said again. “Now.”
Does your team have a strategy and plan of execution in place to collect, segment, compare and manage its data?
why don't i go through my mail right away,
It’s easy to think that Scotland’s James McFadden is in the twilight of his career.
Try it! You may like it and you will see.
I learned some new terminology, from a PDF from the National Park Service, on the geology and history of this area. Tectonic action not only uplifted the Coast Mountains (which line much of the Inside Passage) but forced up magma into chambers which slowly cooled into granite. These are called Plutons. Uplift and erosion exposed these plutons and now help form the dramatic mountains framing the northern skyline of Skagway.
Seriously: electric airplanes. They’re about to take off. Testing begins this spring on the Volta Volare GT4. A recent story in Popular Science spiked interest in the four-passenger carbon fiber aircraft that isn’t really an electric plane but more of a plug-in hybrid plane, much like the Chevrolet Volt. (The PopSci headline touted “electric airplane” and the story admitted “hybrid drivetrain.”) Whatever it is, the Volta Volare aeronautics company of Portland, Oregon says the plane can travel 300 miles on battery power, then a 1.5-liter gasoline engine engages and extends the plane’s range to 1,000 miles. The company sees the plane being attractive for its low cost of operation and its environmental friendliness. Aviation gasoline (avgas) is typically leaded fuel, which has been gone from motor vehicle fuel since the 1980s. On a 200-mile trip in a comparable four-passenger gas-engine private plane, you’d burn $80 worth of avgas, while the electricity to carry the GT4 200 miles would cost only $20.
I hadn’t realized how much time passed since I had posted anything until I opened my “Inspiration” iPhoto album and balked at how many photos I had accrued without making a corresponding makeup look. I’ve been wanting to post a deep-indigo-and-white look for a while since coming across this beautiful floral shot. Indigo is one of those beautiful colors that is often overlooked and excluded from the basic spectrum — so without further ado, let’s give indigo a moment in the spotlight.
Three lines I overheard that were graces:
The sweet turning sour
~Elizabeth Barrett Browing
It was a horrible day today. Awful weather. I actually had to put my winter coat on. I didn't mind putting my very stylish winter hat on, but the coat felt like giving in! It's nearly May, for crying out loud. The rain is one thing, but the cold?
Anyway, there wasn't to much to this card for supplies, but here it is:
It’s beginning to look a lot like Christmas!!! My favorite time of year. Tim Holtz posted his first of the 12 tags of Christmas a few minutes ago and now it’s time for me to post this weeks card and go to bed so I can get up in the morning and make my card!
My Review: Based on the suggestions we were given, we added white waffle weave shower curtains to both bathrooms. Candles were placed on wooden dishes in one bathroom with polished rocks around them. We rolled up our wash cloths and put them in a bamboo basket. We added a tall plant to the bathroom, placed in a bamboo pot. We also put bamboo blinds on our windows.
Yesterday was moving day! My very kind father brought his truck and helped me pack up my old classroom and bring it over to the new one. I kept telling him that I was so glad about how little I actually had to move, and he kept looking at me like I was crazy. :-)
Told you it was sad looking. Even though it looks horrible and isn't terribly warm, it still gets used alot.
And really, I don't exchange cards. This comes from a time when I really had no money, and I watched other people spend more on the cards than I had in my whole Christmas budget. So with me you either get a gift, or you don't get anything. Even when I didn't have money I gave candy or small fruit baskets or candles or some homemade thing rather than exchanging cards. This means that I have a small list of people, and that there are a lot of people giving me cards when I don't give them anything, but I just can't spend time or effort or money on cards.
They have funky signature motif walls in pink! Private pink treatment rooms and the staff who handle my treatment was very well trained. The highlight of my visit was to found out that Honeypot Wax Boutique in One Utama do serve male customer. If you wanna go down butt naked and show some skin do it in style and be well groomed! Do call to make an appointment guys!
At some point, your baby is no more, your toddler has snuck away, and you have in front of you a little girl or boy. And their growth and maturity surprises you daily, but you expected that.
As if I didn’t have enough material to mold the future neurosis of my adulthood, I was growing up in New Mexico. That in itself is scary. As children, we grew up with the story of La Llorona (translation, The Crying Woman). We learned to NEVER play in the arroyos at night or La Llorona would get you. There are many versions of this legend, but basically, she drown her children in the arroyo because her current boyfriend wasn’t the fatherly type. She thought getting rid of her kids would win his favor, but he left her anyway and now she is forever heartbroken with no children. (serves her right) If you listen closely at night, you can hear her walking around the arroyos crying for her babies. If she sees you, she will think you are one of her children and snatch you away. What’s even scarier is when your older relatives tell you that they have seen her from time to time.
Cop: The cuffs are for your protection, so who do you want to talk to? Do you want to talk to a Dr. of some sort?
We are super excited for the new team of Girl Fridays to officially make their inspiration parade debut, and we have all sorts of fun and surprises in store for you this week!
It is so much fun. hmmmm.What next I wonder?
So when my re-enactor friend Nodge Nolan from the Leg II Aug promised to send me an historically accurate replica sponge-stick, I was excited. 'Oh goodie,' I thought. 'Roman toilet paper!' A few days later a long, padded envelope arrived in the post.
